It would, of course, be incorrect to attempt to draw conclusions as to the dangers and the chances of success of suture of cardiac wounds in man from the results obtained by animal experimentation. Animals are placed in very unfavorable conditions after the operation. They are very restless and cannot be kept quiet. Ideal cleanliness is impossible and the animals may infect their wound by rubbing the external wound against the dirt on the floor of their cage. From the animal mortality in these investigations no rigid inferences applicable to human beings can therefore be made. Some conclusions of importance can, however, be drawn. Above all, my experiments seem to show that the mammalian heart will bear a much greater amount of manipulation than has hitherto been suspected. Very large wounds of the heart can heal and the healing process occurs in a manner entirely analogous to that in other muscular tissues. Even an extensive suture of the heart-wall of rabbits and dogs, although we know that thereby a large number of muscle fibres are destroyed and replaced by connective tissue, does not interfere with the function of the cardiac muscle as a whole. Can some of the results in the above recorded experiments be, with some restrictions of course, applied to the human heart? I think that this question must be answered in the affirmative. If we compare the knowledge we possess of wounds of the heart in man, with that obtained from animal experiments, and find that they agree in all essential particulars, then we are justified in reasoning by analogy that suture of wounds of the heart in man will give results similar to those obtained in the animal. In the last few decades, the advances made in all the branches of medicine-especially in pathology, bacteriology and surgery-have been due to a great extent to the generalization of the results of animal experimentation. To the careful and critical investigator, the results obtained in the animal experiment have always been of the greatest value in indicating to him the possibility of results to be obtained by similar procedures in the human body. From the study of wounds of the heart in man, and from the results obtained in my experiments, this conclusion seems therefore justified: wounds of the heart in man, when all other means have been tried and found wanting, can and ought to be closed by suture. The application itself of the suture is devoid of the one great danger that was feared in the past, i. e. of sudden arrest of the heart during the manipulations incident upon the application of the sutures. The number of sutures should be as small as possible so as to limit the amount of connective tissue which will be formed; for all the muscle fibres that are compressed by the sutures eventually atrophy and are replaced by new-formed connective tissue. It is probable that this connective tissue will not lead to degenerative changes in the heart-muscle. On the post-mortem table, fibrous plaques are often found in the otherwise normal human heart. In a number of the muscles of the body fibrous bands-tendinous intersections as they are called-are normally found. In the large number of microscopic sections of the heart-muscle that I have examined, I could find no evidence of pathological changes in the muscle fibres some distance from the scar. For similar reasons the suture should always be an interrupted one. We have shown that there are dangers and disadvantages in the continuous suture both on theoretical grounds and in practical use. The sutures should be passed through as little of the heart substance as possible; if they penetrate the epicardium and a small part of the thickness of the heart-muscle it will generally be sufficient. When the heart's action is not too rapid, each suture should be tied during a diastolic relaxation of the part under treatment. On this point we have not yet any experience in man. Cappelen, in his patient, tied the sutures during systole. Rehn tied them in his case during diastole. Only time and further experience will show how much importance is to be attached to this point. All that can be said, in the present state of our knowledge, is, that on theoretical grounds and from animal experimentation, it must be considered safest to tie the sutures during diastole. On first sight, it might appear difficult to apply sutures to an organ in such constant motion as is the heart. In practice, however, the difficulties have been proven not to be so great as might appear. The heart may be grasped with a forceps and the needle and suture easily passed. It is no more difficult to pass and tie a suture in a large dog than in a small rabbit. Hence we should infer that the difficulties of this procedure in the human heart, are not so great, a fact that has been borne out by the experience of those surgeons who have reported cases of heart-suture in man. The cases will always be few in which this extreme method of treatment-for so we must style it-is necessary. Indeed, of the patients that come under the care of the surgeon, there are some who will recover from even large heart wounds without any local treatment at all. Cases have been recently reported by Conner, Brugnoli, Hamilton and others, where after wounds as large as three centimetres, the haemorrhage ceased spontaneously and the patients recovered. One cannot say, therefore, that wounds larger than a certain size must always be sutured. Each case must be carefully considered by itself. When we examine the nine cases of suture of the human heart in man (see pages 487 to 490) we cannot but hope for considerable success from this new method of surgical procedure. Of the nine cases, four recovered entirely, and four died of complications referable to other organs-quite an encouraging record in a few cases. Finally, I may be permitted to summarize these conclusions as follows: 1. Suture of a wound of the heart as a final resort is an operation worthy of consideration in some cases and often justifiable. 2. Suture of wounds of the heart in animals, and also in man, is devoid of the danger of sudden arrest of the heart, due to the manipulation of the heart incident to the procedure, unless Kronecker's coördination centre be injured. 3. The suture should be an interrupted one of silk, applied in most cases so that the epicardium and superficial layers of the myocardium should be the only ones penetrated, and tied, when possible, during diastole. 4. No stated indications can be given as to the cases that are operable or the time when the operation should be done. Each case must be considered by itself for symptoms which would justify operative interference.
From a case of acute endocarditis of the aortic and mitral valves with infarctions m the spleen and kidneys a micrococcus was twice isolated in pure culture from the blood during life and was demonstrated after death both microscopically and in pure culture in large numbers in the valvular vegetations, the infarctions and other parts. No other species of microorganism was found. This micrococcus is very small, occurs mainly in pairs, sometimes in short chains, stains by Gram's method, grows in small, pale, grayish-white colonies on gelatine and agar, at first clouds bouillon, which then becomes clear with a whitish sediment, does not produce gas in glucose media, liquefies gelatine slowly and to some extent also blood serum, and is especially characterized by its behavior in milk, which it acidifies, coagulates and subsequently liquefies. It produces a milk-curdling ferment and also a proteolytic ferment, each of which is separable from the bacterial cells. It remains viable for months in old cultures and is tolerably resistant to the action of heat and antiseptics. The micrococcus is pathogenic for mice and rabbits, causing either abscesses or general infections. Typical acute vegetative endocarditis was experimentally produced by intravenous inoculation of the organism in a rabbit and a dog, and the cocci were demonstrated in pure culture in the vegetations and other parts of these animals after death. Although the micrococcus here described has some points of resemblance to the pneumococcus and Streptococcus pyogenes on the one hand and to the pyogenic staphylococci on the other, it is readily distinguished from each of these species by cultural features which have been described and which are so obvious that the differentiation of these species from our micrococcus need not be discussed in detail. We have searched through the records concerning microorganisms described in association with endocarditis and other diseases, as well as those isolated from water, soil and other sources, and have been unable to find a description of a micrococcus identical in all particulars with that here described. Such points as staining by Gram, liquefaction of gelatine, coagulation and peptonization of milk, served singly or in combination to distinguish our micrococcus from other forms which in some respects might resemble it. We feel justified, therefore, in recognizing this organism as a new species and from its fermentative properties propose for it the name "Micrococcus zymogenes." Micrococcus zymogenes must be added to the already considerable list of bacteria which have been found as the specific infective agents in endocarditis. That it was the cause of this affection in our case was conclusively demonstrated by its repeated isolation in pure culture from the blood during life, by its presence in pure culture and large numbers after death in the cardiac vegetations, the infarctions, and other parts of the body, and by the experimental proof of its pathogenic properties, and notably its capacity to produce vegetative endocarditis by intravenous inoculation in animals.
THE PRINCIPAL CONCLUSIONS THAT SEEM TO ME JUSTIFIED ARE AS FOLLOWS: 1. The fluorescent pigment formed by some varieties of B. pyocyaneus is produced under conditions identical with those governing the production of the pigment by other "fluorescent bacteria." 2. The production of pyocyanin is not dependent upon the presence of either phosphate or sulfate in the culture medium. It is formed in non-proteid as well as in proteid media, but is not a necessary accompaniment of the metabolic activities of the organism (e. g. tartrate solution). 3. The power of producing pyocyanin under conditions of artificial cultivation is lost sooner than the fluorescigenic power. 4. There are greater natural and acquired differences in pyocyanigenic power than in fluorescigenic. 5. The fluorescent pigment may be oxidized slowly by the action of light and air as well as by reagents into a yellow pigment, and pyocyanin may be similarly oxidized into a black pigment. 6. A convenient separation of B. pyocyaneus into four varieties would be the following: var. alpha, pyocyanigenic and fluorescigenic (most common); var. beta, pyocyanigenic only (rare); var. gamma, fluorescigenic only (not uncommon, closely related to "B. fluorescens liquefaciens"); var. delta, non-chromogenic. 7. Except for the occasional loss of one or another function the different varieties are not so plastic as sometimes assumed, and cannot be readily converted into one another by subjection to varying conditions of life. 8. The signification and correlation of the almost countless physiological variations among the members of this group in respect to growth in gelatin, behavior to temperature, indol production, etc., remain to be determined. It is not yet clear that the variations in chromogenic power can be in any way correlated with the presence or absence of other physiological functions.
1. Bacillus X (Sternberg) belongs to the colon group. 2. Bacillus icteroides (Sanarelli) is a member of the hog-cholera group. 3. The various channels of infection, the duration of the disease and the gross and microscopical lesions in mice, guinea-pigs and rabbits are the same for Bacillus icteroides and the hog-cholera bacillus. 4. The clinical symptoms and the lesions observed in dogs inoculated intravenously with Bacillus icteroides, are reproduced in these animals by infection with the hog-cholera bacillus. 5. Bacillus icteroides when fed to the domestic pig causes fatal infection, accompanied by diphtheritic, necrotic and ulcerative lesions in the digestive tract, such as are seen in hogs when infected with the hog-cholera bacillus. 6. This disease may be acquired by exposing swine in pens already infected with Bacillus icteroides, or by feeding them with the viscera of infected pigs. 7. Guinea-pigs may be immunized with sterilized cultures ofBacillus icteroides from a fatal dose of the hog-cholera bacillus and vice versa. 8. Rabbits may be rendered immune by gradually increasing doses of a living culture of Bacillus icteroides of weak virulence from a fatal dose of a virulent culture of the hog-cholera bacillus 9. The sera of animals immunized with Bacillus icteroides and with the hog-cholera bacillus, respectively, show a marked reciprocal agglutinative reaction. 10. While the blood of yellow fever practically does not exercise an agglutinative reaction upon Bacillus icteroides, the blood of hog-cholera agglutinates this bacillus in a much more marked degree, thus pointing, we think, to the closer etiological relationship of this bacillus to hog-cholera than to yellow fever.
(1) Congenital syphilitic pancreatitis retards the development of the glandular acini but does not affect the islands of Langerhans. Embedded in the stroma, but not invaded by it, the latter maintain their continuity with the small ducts and acini with which they have a common origin. (2) Two types of chronic interstitial inflammation affecting the developed pancreas are distinguishable: (a) Interlobular Pancreatitis.-In the interlobular variety the inflammatory process is localized chiefly at the periphery of the lobule and implicates the islands of Langerhans only when the sclerotic process has reached a very advanced grade. When pancreatitis has followed obstruction of the ducts, the islands long remain unaltered though embedded in dense scar-like tissue. (b) Interacinar Pancreatitis.-In the interacinar type the process is diffuse, invading the lobules and separating individual acini. The inflammatory change invades the islands of Langerhans. (3) A relationship has been observed between lesions of the islands of Langerhans and the occurrence of diabetes mellitus. (a) In one of eleven cases of interlobular panereatitis diabetes of mild intensity occurred. The sclerosis, which in this case followed obstruction of the ducts by calculi, was far advanced and affected the islands of Langerhans. (b) In two of three cases of interacinar pancreatitis, diabetes was present. The third case was associated with a condition, haemochromatosis, which at a later stage is associated with diabetes, the result of pancreatic lesion. (c) In a fourth case of diabetes, hyaline deposit between the capillaries and the parenchymatous cells had so completely altered the islands of Langerhans that they were no longer recognizable.
1. The endings of the motor nerves in striped muscle remain on the outside of the sarcolemma. Aside from the surfaces of contact of muscle and nerve fibre, the end fibres are covered down to their tips with the sheath of Schwann and are provided with nuclei. The precise condition of things at the places of contact of muscle and nerve is an unsolved problem of histology. 2. The ivy-like or festooned arrangement of motor nerves in the frog's muscle has been misinterpreted. Properly interpreted it demonstrates that the nerve fibres that are to influence the muscle fibre are not naked and that they need not be end fibres. It shows that mere contact between muscle fibre and nerve fibre is all that is necessary. 3. The sheath of Henle in the frog and in the smaller muscle fibres of the snake is open, thus permitting escape of the cerebrospinal fluid. 4. In other animals Henle's sheath extends over the end fibres of the motor nerve and the cells lining it envelop the end fibrils. I find that the so-called "Sohlensubstanz" of Kühne is derived from the cells of Henle's sheath. 5. The terminal nerves in smooth muscle form a network entwining the bundles of muscle fibres. I consider it improbable that each plain muscle fibre has a special terminal nerve fibril. 6. In muscular tissue fine non-medullated nerves, probably belonging to the centrifugal, vasomotor system, proceed from the fasciculi of motor nerves. These nerves can be traced directly to a network of nerves surrounding the capillaries. From this network fine, nucleated, nerve fibres pass to the walls of the capillaries, with which they are very closely united. 7. The nerves supplying the capillaries connect also with sensory nerves and with nerves surrounding the larger blood-vessels, both arteries and veins. 8. The branches of the chorda tympani in the submaxillary gland do not pass to the gland cells, but they terminate on the capillaries. 9. In muscular and glandular tissues-and perhaps throughout the body-there is a vast peripheral nervous plexus belonging to the capillary blood-vessels. These nerves of the capillaries, which may perhaps be regarded as nutritive nerves, regulate the production and transudation of lymph, and are concerned in the mechanism of glandular secretion. They may be called into activity both by peripheral influences and by impulses received from the central nervous system and the sympathetic ganglia. They may influence, through their connections with the vasomotor nerves on the arteries and veins, the blood supply to a part.
1. Bile increases the digestion of fat when given by the mouth in pill form. The percentage of fat lost in the stools of our patient with a complete biliary fistula was 63 per cent in the first period and 57 per cent in the third. This closely corresponds to the results that Müller obtained in human beings and dogs with complete obstruction of the common duct. Under bile medication the stools contained 23 per cent less fat than in the first period, and 17 per cent less than in the third. This represents an actual diminution of the amount of fat lost in the stools. Looking at the result in another way, it may be said that the average digestion of fat in the periods without bile was 40 per cent; in the periods with bile, 60 per cent, i. e., bile increased the digestion of fat relatively by 50 per cent. 2. The digestion of nitrogenous food is improved by the use of bile pills when the amount of fat in the stools is large. Instead of an average of 15 per cent being lost in the faeces, but 7 per cent escaped digestion during the four days the patient took bile. The reason for this, perhaps, lies in the better digestion of fat at this time, in consequence of which the proteid elements of the food were more thoroughly exposed to the digestive juices. 3. Ox bile is a cholagogue. The amount of bile-solids secreted in the bile period was 47 per cent greater than in the periods before and after. This confirms the work of Pfaff and Balch, here in Boston, on a human being, and that of Stadelmann and his pupils, in Germany, on dogs. 4. The effect of the bile on the bowels in this case was not remarkable, although they moved more satisfactorily during the bile period. In my experiments with dogs I usually obtained diarrhoea when giving bile. I do not feel sure, however, that this should be attributed wholly to the medication, for the diarrhoeas as a rule appeared six or more days after the beginning of the experiment and the animals were then in poor condition. Dr. Pfaff, who has had more experience with the administration of bile than I, tells me that he has found its action variable in patients. In some cases it is a laxative; in others, in which there is diarrhoea, due apparently to large amounts of fat in the food, it has the opposite effect. 5. As to the general effect of bile on body metabolism, it was observed that the urea and nitrogen were excreted in greater amount in the bile period than in either of the others. No definite conclusions can be drawn from this fact, because more nitrogen was ingested during these four days; moreover, it must be borne in mind that in these results the salol may have been a factor. 6. The amount of urine was increased by more than 50 per cent in the bile period. It is interesting to note that the amount was about the same during this bile period as in the second experiment when the bile was again taking its natural course. Von Noorden has recorded a similar increase in the amount of urine following the removal of the obstruction in acute catarrhal jaundice. The salol coating of the bile pills, which amounted to one and a quarter grammes a day, is not sufficient to account for this effect. This is evident from the work of Kumagawa, who gave two grammes of sodium salicylate daily to a dog of 25 kilos without essentially changing the amount of urine secreted. On the other hand, in taking the 30 pills daily the patient drank several extra glasses of water, and in the second experiment her general condition was naturally better than at any other time.
1. In the case investigated, one of Malta fever, the leucocytes were reduced to between 1500 and 3000 per cubic millimetre. 2. Notwithstanding this, the alloxur bodies and the phosphoric acid in the urine, the patient being on an alloxur-free diet, showed no distinct diminution from the normal. 3. The suggestion is made that this result may be due to the leucopenia being brought about by an increased destruction of leucocytes in the spleen rather than to a diminished activity of the bone-marrow.
IT SEEMS DESIRABLE TO EMPHASIZE THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS: 1. A careful balancing of the normal acids and bases of the urine makes it possible not merely to detect the presence of organic acids in the urine, but also to determine approximately the amount of such acids. The method recently described by Herter and Wakeman can be recommended as securing a greater degree of accuracy, for the amount of labor involved, than any other procedure. 2. The determination of the N of NH(3) is a useful procedure for clinical purposes, since it is probably true that a considerable excretion of organic acid (say 15 gm. oxybutyric or more in 24 hours) is always attended by an increased excretion of NH(3). As much organic acid as corresponds to 10 gm. oxybutyric acid may be excreted in 24 hours without causing an increased excretion of NH(3) (Case IX). We cannot therefore rely on the ammonia output to detect moderate quantities of organic acid. 3. Where organic acids are removed in considerable amount without increasing the excretion of NH(3), the acid takes out other alkalies, probably in some instances chiefly K. 4. In cases of diabetic coma the urine always contains a large excess of organic acids and the N of NH(3) is usually increased to 18 to 25 per cent of the total N. 5. Crotonic acid can regularly be obtained from the urines of patients in diabetic coma. 6. The condition of diabetic coma is preceded by a period of days, weeks or months, in which there is a large excretion of beta-oxybutyric acid (20 gm. or more in 24 hours), and in which the N of NH(3) is largely increased. 7. Patients whose urines show or have shown a large excretion of organic acids are in danger of developing diabetic coma, but the N of NH(3) may temporarily rise as high as 16 per cent and yet coma may be delayed for more than 7 months (Case VII). The persistent excretion of more than 25 gm. of beta-oxybutyric acid indicates impending coma. 8. A patient passing 30 gm. of beta-oxybutyric acid in 24 hours may still have enough energy and strength to be about all day and perform considerable muscular work (Case X). 9. A patient who has been excreting very little organic acid and has gained weight may within a few months show the presence of considerable quantities of organic acid, and die in typical diabetic coma (Case VII). 10. When the urine contains little or no organic acid there is no immediate prospect of diabetic coma, but patients with such urine are probably liable to most of the other dangers that threaten diabetic patients. The relation between the degree of acid intoxication and the susceptibility to infection seems worthy of special experimental study. 11. Where the urine regularly contains more than 200 gm. of sugar per day there is usually considerable organic acid in the urine and large amounts of acid, indicative of coma, are invariably accompanied by considerable or great glycosuria. 12. Sometimes there is much sugar and little or no acid in the urine, and sometimes there is considerable acid and little sugar. These facts render it desirable to examine the urine of diabetic patients at least once a month with reference to the amount of acid excreted, for the element of acid intoxication must be clearly separated from the element of glycosuria in our study of the progress of a case. In other words, we must recognize the acid intoxication as an important and sometimes as a dominant factor in the prognosis, and this element should be regarded even in those cases of diabetes which have the clinical indications of a mild type of the disease. We may thus hope to prolong life in many instances by taking precautions, as to diet and out-of-door life, which might not otherwise be deemed necessary. 13. The withdrawal of carbohydrate food frequently leads to a considerable reduction in the quantity of organic acids excreted. The reason for this is not yet clear and the phenomenon deserves careful study.
1. Capsules made as described above allow dialysis, when placed in the peritoneal cavity. 2. The normal tissues, unstimulated, do not possess the power of causing agglutination; they do not require to be stimulated by the presence of the bacterial bodies, but will produce their share of the agglutinins when acted upon by the bacillary products. 3. Agglutination follows the insertion, in the peritoneal cavity, of "capsuled" bacilli; it gradually increases in degree, and on the removal of the capsule containing the bacilli, begins to disappear. 4. Varieties of bacilli, related closely in morphology and cultural reactions, do not, as a rule, produce serums which inter-agglutinate.
The preceding observations record a new instance of the occurrence of cyclic albuminuria in an otherwise apparently healthy young man. The typical course of the proteid excretion from hour to hour under various conditions has been reviewed and its independence of the changes in diet or muscular work pointed out. No relationship between the volume of urine eliminated and the quantity of proteid excreted has been ascertained. The specific effect of the horizontal posture in dispelling the albuminuria is the most interesting feature observed. The attempt to refer this to attendant circulatory changes in the kidneys is, for the present, no more than an interesting speculation. See PDF for Structure See PDF for Structure.
THE CONCLUSIONS WHICH WE DERIVE FROM OUR OBSERVATIONS ARE AS FOLLOWS: 1. The excretion of injected, egg-albumen as such is in no case complete. The quantity retained varies from 23 to 100%. 2. The amount retained varies: a) directly with the slowness of absorption. This is determined by the manner of administration. b) directly with the time during which the proteid remains in the body; and therefore inversely to the rapidity of excretion. c) inversely to the quantity injected; this has however much less effect than (a) or (b). d) with individual peculiarities; but these are not very conspicuous. 3. The excreted proteid coagulates at the same temperatures as the injected albumen. 4. Injection of egg-albumen does not cause the appearance of globulins in the urine. 5. The proportion of proteid coagulating at lower temperatures is less in the urine than in the injected solution. When a solution has been heated to 73 degrees before injection, the urine also does not coagulate below this temperature. 6. Egg-albumen injected into the hen is excreted as with mammals. 7. The albuminuria lasts in typical cases from 1(1/2) to 3 days, according to the manner of administration. The excretion begins very shortly (7 minutes) after injection. 37 per cent of the total proteid injected may be excreted in an hour. About three-fourths of the total excretion takes place within the first 17 hours; the excretion is almost completed in the next 15 hours, only traces being excreted thereafter. With hypodermic injection the amount is more nearly equal on 2 or 3 successive days, since the absorption may extend over 2 days. 8. Alkali-albumin, as well as muscle-proteids (from foreign species) are completely retained. An unconverted mixture of egg-albumen and sodium carbonate behaves like egg-albumen. 9. A small amount of proteid (less than 5%) is excreted unchanged by the faeces. 10. A variable proportion is excreted as non-coagulable proteid. The quantity of this is proportional to that of the coagulable proteid of the urine. 11. The rest undergoes complete metabolism to urea. 12. The total nitrogen excretion is increased beyond the amount of nitrogen introduced as albumen. 13. Starvation appears to cause an increase in the ratio of the urea to the total nitrogen of the urine. 14. The effects of intravenous injection of egg-albumen on circulation and respiration do not differ from those of an equivalent injection of the solvent. Albumen causes, however, a specific diuresis, beginning 50 minutes after the intravenous injection, and reaching its maximum in about 2 hours. It causes neither glycosuria nor haemoglobinuria. 15. The injection of egg-albumen, alkaline egg-syntonin, or muscle extracts, causes in rabbits a rise of temperature of 1 to 2 degrees C. This begins in about an hour, usually reaches its maximum in from 6 to 8 hours, and then falls rapidly. It may in rare cases persist for several days. It is indifferent qualitatively whether the injection is made by the jugular or the ear-vein, hypodermically, or into the peritoneum. Even extremely small quantities injected into the ear-vein cause this rise. The fever does not cause histological alterations in any organ examined. The injection of normal salt solution may cause a rise, but this is much smaller. 16. The injection of egg-albumen causes but very slight histological changes. The kidneys are usually congested, especially in the cortex. The cells may be slightly cloudy. A slight degree of nephritis may occur, but this is not of such degree as to effect permanent lesions. The injection of muscle extracts may give rise to a more pronounced parenchymatous nephritis. 17. Urethane is fatal to rabbits in doses of 0.75 to 1.0 grm. per kilo. The symptoms consist mainly in a very marked fall of temperature, and in medullary paralysis. 0.5 grm. per kilo. lowers the temperature 2.3 degrees C. Doses as small as 0.6 grm. per kilo cause very marked histological changes, consisting mainly in extensive granular and vacuolar degeneration of the hepatic epithelium, which are so acute as to be fully developed when death occurs in 1(1/2) hours after injection. Doses of 0.35 grm. per kilo. do not produce this change. Chloretone did not cause the degeneration, but is followed by congestion of the abdominal viscera. 18. Native egg-albumen, injected into the femoral vein of a dog, was followed in one case by a fatal ending with convulsions and coma, after several intervening cases of good health. Further experiments demonstrated that there is no toxicity inherent in fresh egg-albumen, nor can it be developed by breeding the eggs in the shell. The cause of the above fatal issue must therefore be sought in some extraneous toxic agent which contaminated the solution. Muscle-extracts were also devoid of toxicity. Alkali-albumin produces no changes beyond those which may be attributed to the free alkali contained therein.
1. The increase of conductivity produced by saponin in formaldehyde-hardened blood is due to an increase in the conductivity of the corpuscles (increased permeability of the corpuscles to ions) and not, mainly at any rate, to the liberation of electrolytes from the corpuscles and a consequent increase in the conductivity of the serum. The increase in the permeability of the corpuscles is probably caused by a "corrosive," dissolving, or emulsifying action of the saponin on some non-proteid constituent of the envelope or stroma. 2. In the first stage of the action of saponin on blood (not fixed by formaldehyde) there seems also to be an increase in the permeability of the corpuscles for ions, even before any haemoglobin has been liberated. The liberation of the haemoglobin may be secondary to this, owing to the entrance, of water consequent on the disturbance of osmotic equilibrium. 3. Heating the blood to 40 degrees to 45 degrees C. intensifies the laking action of saponin, so that a dose insufficient to cause laking at ordinary temperature may do so when the blood is heated to the temperature mentioned. 4. Pus corpuscles, like red blood corpuscles, are worse conductors than the serum in which they are suspended. Unlike blood corpuscles, they show no preference for NH(4)Cl as compared with NaCl. On the other hand, the conductivity of pus is increased by the action of saponin, just as is the case with blood, and apparently very much in the same way, that is to say, by an action on the corpuscles and not on the serum. The fixing of the pus corpuscles by formaldehyde does not hinder this action of saponin.
By morphological examination and with current cultural methods a clear differentiation cannot always be made between pneumococci and streptococci. The chief differential character usually depended upon is the capsule of the pneumococcus. Well-marked capsules, however, may occur on organisms which have with reason been classified as streptococci. On the other hand, capsules may not he demonstrable on pneumococci by the usual methods, especially when growing on artificial culture media. The usual cultural characters and reactions are at best not diagnostic, and are subject to variations which may render them useless as evidence of specific difference. The experiments recorded in this paper, however, afford some evidence that there are well-marked differences between the metabolic activities of pneumococci and streptococci, which may prove useful in the differentiation of these organisms. These differences in metabolism become apparent when the pneumococci and streptococci are cultivated in an alkaline serum medium, or in a serum medium to which the carbohydrate, inulin, has been added. Pneumococci slowly produce acid in the alkaline serum.
FROM THE PRECEDING I DERIVE THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS: 1. The disease which formerly has been described as a form of protozoon-infection is due to an infection with a pathogenic fungus. 2. The infection may primarily be either a cutaneous or a pulmonary one. 3. The lesions produced by this fungus fall under the general head of infectious granulomata and consist partly in nodules resembling altogether those produced by the tubercle bacilli and partly in chronic abscesses. 4. The adult forms of the parasite are more apt to produce nodules, the sporulating forms abscesses. 5. The fungus is pathogenic for dogs, rabbits and guinea-pigs probably other animals also, and in them produces lesions very similar to those which we encounter in the human being in this disease. 6. Supurative periorchitis in guinea-pigs is not pathognomonic for glanders.
THE RESULTS OF THIS INVESTIGATION MAY BE SUMMARIZED AS FOLLOWS: 1. The inhalation of formaldehyde gas in even small quantities is followed by bronchitis and pneumonia. Pneumonia is due to the inhalation of the gas and not to secondary infection. 2. Formalin belongs to that rare group of poisons which are capable of producing death suddenly when swallowed. 3. The introduction of formalin into the stomach is followed by the production of a gastritis which varies greatly in character. The duodenum and upper jejunum may also be involved in the inflammatory process. 4. Intraperitoneal injections of formalin cause peritonitis of a fibrino-haemorrhagic character. A definite reaction is obtained when very dilute formalin (1-1000) is employed. In the peritoneal cavity formalin exercises a destructive action upon all organs (pancreas, liver, peritoneal fat, Fallopian tubes, etc.) with which it comes in contact and causes inflammation in these organs. 5. The lethal dose of formalin when injected intraperitoneally into guinea pigs is approximately 2 cc. of 1-1000 formalin for each 100 grm. of body weight. 6. The injection of formalin into the lungs is followed by pneumonia and bronchitis. 7. The inflammation which follows subcutaneous injections of formalin is characterized by intense exudation. 8. The injection of formalin into the muscles produces myositis. 9. The injection of formalin into the anterior chamber of the eye causes the accumulation of an exudate containing leucocytes and fibrin. When formalin is dropped into the conjunctival sac iritis follows and may be severe enough to destroy the eye. 10. Formalin in whatever way introduced into the body is absorbed, and is then capable of producing lesions in the parenchymatous organs. 11. Changes in the liver after absorption of formalin consist of mild or severe grade of cloudy swelling accompanied by vacuolation of the protoplasm, changes in the nuclei and leucocytic infiltration. Focal necrosis may result. Similar changes follow the inhalation of formaldehyde. 12. The injection of formalin or the inhalation of the vapors of formaldehyde produces cloudy swelling of the parenchyma of the kidney. Focal necrosis may result. 13. Pneumonia and bronchitis are found in all animals after the injection of formalin. 14. The leucocytic infiltration which follows the introduction of formalin into an organ has these general characteristics: The eosinophiles are the first leucocytes to appear; these are followed by the other polynuclear leucocytes; last appear the large and small mononuclear leucocytes. Similar phenomena occur in the trachea, bronchi and lungs of animals subjected to formaldehyde inhalations. 15. Formalin is, directly or indirectly, chemiotactic for leucocytes. The tissues which are not infiltrated with leucocytes after the injection of formalin are those which have been so injured by the chemical that an inflammatory reaction is impossible. 16. Animals subjected to chronic poisoning with formalin administered by intraperitoneal injection develop fibrinous peritonitis, associated with marked eosinophilia. The changes in the kidneys and liver consist of cloudy swelling, fatty degeneration, focal necrosis and leucocytic infiltration.
The virulent cholera spirillum possesses a greater number of bacteriolytic and agglutinable haptophore groups, or these groups are endowed with a greater avidity for uni- and amboceptors than the avirulent. The number or the avidity of the bacteriolytic receptors possessed by a bacterium is directly proportional to its virulence. However, the agglutinable receptors do not follow this law, i.e., the agglutinable haptophore groups are not necessarily present in the same proportion as the bactericidal ones. While the energy of growth is a very important factor in relation to virulence, other phenomena must also be considered. The virulent organism possesses a greater number of toxic haptophore groups than the avirulent. The binding power of the free receptors of the organisms for bacteriolytic amboceptors in vitro is proportional to the bactericidal immunity produced in animals by each, which latter is in turn proportional to the virulence of the organisms from which the receptors were extracted. The binding power in vitro of the dead micro-organisms of different virulence for bacteriolytic amboceptors is not in proportion to their toxicity. The bactericidal immunity obtained by means of the inoculation with the dead organisms of different virulence, or their extracts obtained by autolytic digestion, is proportional to the virulence of the living strains of the bacteria employed. With the living organisms, while the bactericidal immunity obtained from the inoculation of animals with the virulent organism is greater than that produced with the avirulent, such immunity is not in direct proportion to the virulence of the bacteria introduced. These conclusions apply to the two strains of cholera spirilk employed in the foregoing experiments. Whether they will also hold good with other strains of this spirillum or for micro organisms in general, must be decided by further experimenta work.
The results above reported lead to the conclusion that while in the degenerating cells chemical changes are taking place tending toward a diminution of the hexon bases as a whole, they affect the arginin especially. One may picture the process either as a partial or as a complete breaking down of certain proteid. material more or less rich in hexon bases, leaving behind. proteid matter poorer in bases. The meaning of these changes is, however, obscure, and with the limited number of known facts bearing upon the subject, it would seem idle even to attempt to formulate an hypothesis to explain them. Certain work of other investigators is, however, suggestive in this connection. Kossel and Dakin, for instance, as illustrated by their work upon the simple proteid body clupein, found that a partial destruction of the proteid molecule, involving the arginin group, is brought about by a ferment furnished by the animal organism. When subjected to the hydrolytic action of a mineral acid, clupein yields arginin in considerable abundance. But if the clupein is first acted upon by the ferment arginase found in the liver, and then subjected to acid hydrolysis, the yield of arginin is appreciably diminished. Among the cleavage products in the latter instance are the components of arginin, namely, omithin and urea. It would seem, therefore, as if the ferment had loosened the union between the omithin and urea in the arginin group, so that upon subsequent hydrolysis a diminution of arginin resulted. In the cases studied by me, it may be that the conditions were favorable for some such ferment action as that above described, and hence the relatively low yield of arginin. No attempt, however, was made to ascertain if omithin were present in the urine. Its presence there would seem not wholly unlikely when one considers the diminished power of oxidation of the phosphorus-poisoned cell, although Thompson has shown that arginin or omithin when administered to a healthy dog as food or by hypodermic injection is eliminated for the most part as urea, no ornithin being found. There might seem to be a conflict between this view and the results recently published by Wohlgemuth, but it must be borne in mind that the influences at work causing the breaking down of the proteid molecule are probably quite diverse in character. Wohlgemuth has recently shown for the first time that a diamino acid may actually find its way into the urine in phosphorus poisoning. He found arginin in the urine not only in rabbits poisoned with phosphorus but also in a patient suffering from phosphorus poisoning. On the other hand, he was unable to find lysin in the urine. This fact is of especial interest in view of the evidence set forth in this paper that the arginin base is lost to the proteid molecule more rapidly than the lysin base. The correspondence between the findings in the liver and in the urine is thus a close one. How much of the arginin liberated from the proteid molecule may find its way into the urine is of course uncertain. It seems reasonable to suppose that a portion of the base is acted upon by the arginase ferment in the manner already described. Of the seventeen to eighteen cleavage products of the proteid molecule thus far isolated, the hexon bases are among the most stable. One or more of these bases have been found in practically all proteid matter thus far investigated; in fact arginin is so uniformly present that Kossel has made the suggestion that it is the kernel of the proteid molecule. At all events, the question may be asked, whether, if the influences at work in the altered liver tissue were of a general character causing a diminution of the hexon bases, the monoamino acid groups would not suffer even a greater diminution; and since the pathological condition is undoubtedly associated with impaired oxidation, their presence should not be expected in the urine. As a matter of fact, Ignatowski found considerable quantities of monoamino acids in the urine of patients suffering from gout, pneumonia, and leukaemia, though under normal conditions no monoamino acids were found in the urine, indeed, not even after the subcutaneous injection of glycokoll. Furthermore, the loosening of the amino acids from the proteid molecule is suggested by the fact that Taylor found such acids in the liver of a patient who died from a hepatic disease of obscure etiology, but which he was inclined to attribute to chloroform poisoning. Taylor found not only leucin and tyrosin in the liver, but also arginin, a fact not without interest in view of the diminished arginin content found in the livers of the chloroformed dogs after acid hydrolysis. Moreover, the falling off of the hexon bases under the conditions studied seems quite in accordance with some results recently reported by Levene. He has shown that certain cleavage products obtained by the action of mineral acids upon self-digested pancreas, spleen, and liver, are much diminished when compared with the products obtained from the fresh glands. The lysin and arginin of the digested liver, for example, showed a diminution of over 50 per cent. It is now well established that in course of the process of aseptic autolysis, the proteids of the liver cell undergo decomposition into simpler substances, and Jacoby showed that during life autolysis may go on in portions of the liver in which the circulation has been hindered. But of greater significance still in this connection, is the observation made by Jacoby on the autolytic changes in the liver during phosphorus poisoning. He found that when the normal liver substance is permitted to autolyse the solution of the liver substance is a slow one. On the other hand, under similar conditions the liver of a phosphorus-poisoned animal undergoes rapid and almost complete solution. The difference in the behavior of the normal and damaged liver points to an increase of normal ferment action in the case of the poisoned organ. It thus seems reasonable to suppose that in phosphorus poisoning we have during life an exaggerated breaking down of the proteid molecule associated with an over-action of certain ferments, and among them probably arginase. The pathological process in the liver during life may, therefore, be thought of as proceeding in the same general direction as the process of post-morten autolytic decomposition. By means of further studies along lines indicated in this paper, it should be possible to gain a deeper insight into numerous pathological processes. The changes in amyloid degeneration are among those which promise to be better understood through the application of the new methods of chemical analysis. Moreover, it cannot be doubted that pharmacology as well as toxicology has much to gain from a study of what happens to the proteid molecule under the influence of poisons.
The serum of an inflammatory exudate has the power of inhibiting the action of proteolytic ferments contained in the leucocytes. This anti-enzymotic power is possessed by the blood serum from which it doubtless passes into the exudate. In the later stages of inflammation there is some diminution of this anti-enzymotic action. The anti-body contained in the serum is destroyed by a temperature of 75 degrees C. The proteolytic ferments of the leucocytes act both in an acid and in an alkaline medium but are most efficient in the latter. The anti-enzymotic action of the serum is favored by an alkaline reaction, but is completely lost in an acid medium.
In sections of control and normal skin, the nuclei of the epithelial cells were often indented by the cell protoplasm, giving them an appearance similar to those indented by Mallory's bodies. It would seem that if these bodies of Mallory's were protozoa they would have been found in the sections from both the living and the dead skin of scarlet-fever and measles, as they were present in the blister fluid. Their absence is certainly more suggestive of a degeneration than of a protozoon. This view is also borne out by the fact that they were not found immediately after death, but were present in another specimen from the same case removed twenty-four hours later. It would seem probable also that the bodies found in the blister fluid were the products of degeneration and cytolytic activity, because they were found in the antitoxin rashes as well as in the cases of scarlet-fever and measles. The histological changes in the skin of these two diseases leads us to expect the presence of cytolytic products both in the blister fluid and in the sections. It certainly cannot be stated that none of these bodies is a protozoön, but it can be positively stated that a great majority of them arise from degenerating cells; and in many cases, I think, it is not possible to differentiate a degeneration from a protozoön by the study of its morphology and staining reactions. The bodies present in blister fluid resemble very closely those granular bodies found in blood under certain conditions, and seen in vaccine lymph and in emulsions of tissues and in exudates. I think, therefore, that they are for the most part, if not wholly, products of degenerating tissue cells and of leucocytes, and within certain limits specific to scarlet-fever and measles.
The treatment of washed erythrocytes of the guinea-pig by a heated immune hemolytic serum derived from the rabbit, and of washed erythrocytes of the sheep by a similar serum derived from the goat, renders the erythrocytes more or less resistant to the subsequent action of tetanolysin. If all the serum is removed from corpuscles treated in this manner, it can be determined that some of the protection is due to the agglutination of the cells. A certain amount of the protection afforded by agglutination is referable to the physical barrier which the agglutinated mass of cells offers to the uniform distribution and diffusion of the tetanolysin. It is probable that none of the protection obtained is due to the mere union of agglutinin or of hemolytic amboceptors with their respective cell-receptors; such union would appear to leave the tetanophile receptors still unoccupied. If a residuum of serum is left with the corpuscles which have been treated as indicated, the added protection which is acquired against the subsequent action of tetanolysin may reasonably be referred to antitoxin which is present in the residual serum. The possibility of the dissociation of a union between the tetanophile receptor and its antibody, occasioned by the dilution incident to washing away the serum, may not be entirely ignored, but has not been susceptible to determination. The same may be said of the possibility that tetanolysin, having a stronger affinity for the tetanophile receptor than has the antibody, is able to displace the latter from its union with the receptor. Hence treating corpuscles with the immune serums does not allow one to determine the presence or absence of an antibody for the tetanophile receptor, the experiments being formulated on the supposition that such an antibody would unite with the tetanophile receptors and thereby prevent subsequent binding of tetanolysin.
The group of dysentery organisms is a large and. varied one. It may be divided, as is well known, into two main sub-groups, the "Shiga-Kruse" and the "mannit-fermenters," which are of equal importance and entirely distinct. If we take decided differences in agglutination, as determined by absorptions, as a criterion of specificity, the latter group includes at least four distinct species with a number of sub-varieties and transition forms. Two of the above species are found among organisms which split either dextrose, mannit, and saccharose or in addition maltose. The other two species are represented by the bacillus "Y" of Hiss and Russell and the "Flexner-Manila" bacillus. If we adopt Ford's proposal, that a new species should be made for each culture showing a constant cultural or agglutinative difference, the number would increase considerably. At the best, however, classification of bacteria is at present very artificial. Although so many types appear among the " mannit-fermenters," there is no reason why they should not all be included in the dysentery group of bacilli, provided the reaction in litmus milk be typical. This cultural test, as Duval has emphasized, is the most constant one which we have at present, but it should extend over several weeks in order to exclude lactose fermenters. In contradistinction to the heterogeneity of the "mannit-fermenters," the homogeneity of the "Shiga-Kruse" type stands in marked contrast. Every culture of the latter which. was tested (about twenty in all) reacted in all media and agglutinated with all the various sera exactly alike. One is tempted to explain this diversity of the "mannit-fermenters" by accepting the suggestion of Flexner, that they may be occasional, if not constant, inhabitants of the normal intestine. Certainly Duval has isolated the "mannit-fermenters" from the mildest cases of diarrhoea, to say nothing of the two apparently normal infants from which he also obtained them. Furthermore, the agglutinins for the mannit group in normal blood might be accounted for on this hypothesis, as well as the many differences in fermentation and agglutination. For, as has been well said by Smith and Reagh, one " should keep in mind the various adaptations in the intestine-it may be to the food remains in the large intestine, to the mucus on the surface of the epithelium, to the contents of the tubules and the larger flask-shaped glands, and further, with this progressive adaptation are associated modifications of biological characters which most likely involve agglutinative capacities as well." The fact that dysentery bacilli have not been isolated frequently from the normal intestine might be explained by their habitat being possibly within the mucus tubules and their number few under normal condition, for it is well known that they are most frequently found in association with mucus. When abnormal conditions, however, arise and the production of mucus increases, these organisms would possibly multiply in number pari passu and find themselves in a favorable position to attack any slight injury which might occur in the wall of the intestine. The "Shiga-Kruse," or Group I, type, on the other hand, seems to present the characters of a true parasite. Only an insignificant amount of agglutinin is present for it in normal human blood and that of laboratory animals, according to most authorities; it agglutinates alike in various immune sera; it has a very marked toxicity for laboratory animals; it has never been isolated from the normal human intestine, although an organism in some respects like it has been described by Ford as being an inhabitant of the normal intestine; it produces no indol; it splits only the monosaccharids, through which it falls in line with the conclusion of Smith and Reagh, that the less a bacillus acts on sugars the more pronounced is its parasitic character. Whether or not it ever invades the blood in numbers is a question yet to be decided.
1. Typical pneumococci were present dunng the winter months in the throat secretions of a large percentage of healthy individuals in city and country. 2. A higher percentage of atypical strains of pneumococci have been obtained from healthy persons than from those suffering from pneumonia. In the latter cases the atypical strains may have been overlooked, because of the larger number of typical pneumococci present. Many of the atypical strains seem to be closely related to the streptococci. 3. The so-called Streptococcus mucosus Schottmuller, which has hitherto been classed with the distinct streptococci, is placed as a definite variety among the pneumococci, and it is recommended that the name be changed to Streptococcus lanceolatus, var. mucosus. 4. A lower percentage of strains of pneumococci virulent for rabbits in the doses used has been obtained from normal cases by rabbit inoculations of mass cultures than from cases of pneumonia by the same method. 5. Since the virulence of pneumococci may be rapidly increased for a susceptible species of experimental animal by successive passage, and since pneumococci obtained from most pneumonias are more virulent for experimental animals than are those obtained from healthy individuals, therefore the virulence of pneumococci from cases of human infection is probably increased for human beings; hence cases of pneumonia should be considered to a certain degree as contagious and, since the virulence of the pneumococcus may be quickly increased and since the organism is very prevalent in normal sputum, all possible measures should be taken to restrict public expectoration. 6. By repeated inoculations into sheep of a pneumococcus strain, a specific protective power of this serum for mice is developed against the homologous strain and against certain other strains, one morphological variety (Streptococcus lanceolatus, var.mucosus) being thus clearly differentiated from other strains. 7. Coincident with this production of protective power, a slight specific increase of the sheep serum in phagocytic power in vitro has been observed with some strains of pneumococci, all strains of Streptococcus lanceolatus, var. mucosus, acting similarly with the serum produced by the inoculation of one strain; the strains of some other varieties, however, have shown no definite relationship between the phagocytic power and the protective power of the serum.
Owing to unavoidable circumstances only a limited amount of time was available for the work on agglutination. The foregoing report is therefore preliminary only and the following conclusions are provisionally offered: I. Pneumococci by reason of their agglutinating properties exhibit a tendency to separate into numerous groups similar to streptococci. II. Pneumococcus mucosus forms a distinct and consistent variety. The production by it of common agglutinins for some pneumococci and the resistance of the agglutinins produced by it to absorption by the streptococcus indicate a nearer relation to the former than to the latter organism. III. The agglutinating substances in the serum of immunized animals were demonstrated by absorption tests to consist of specific and group agglutinins in cases where the agglutinins were sufficiently developed to make use of this method. IV. The pneumococci seem to show marked differences in their ability to undergo agglutination. V. There was considerable uniformity of reaction of the various strains in low dilutions, but this uniformity is not continued as the animal becomes more highly immunized. VI. At present it is not possible to establish a definite relation between the agglutination reaction and the other characteristics of the pneumococcus excepting in the case of the Pneumococcus mucosus.
THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS MAY BE DRAWN, BASED UPON THE RESULT OF OUR RESEARCHES: 1. Organisms of the pneumococcus or streptococcus group are present in the lungs of practically all cases, whether normal or showing a variety of lesions; strictly speaking, they were found by us in forty out of forty-two cases, or in 95% of our series. 2. The pneumococci and the streptococci were obtained in practically similar percentages-that is, in 50 % of the cases. 3. Pneumococci were not obtained more frequently in the small series of patients exposed for some time to hospital atmosphere; our tables show the contrary to obtain. The number of cases examined were, however, insufficient, and the findings may thus be accidental, and hence of no value. 4. Test micro-organisms, namely, small portions-half a drachm or less-of B. prodigiosus, introduced into the human mouth after death, were conveyed to and recovered from the lungs by culture in a little over half of the cases in which this experiment was tried. The test micro-organisms are, we believe, conveyed to the lungs with the fluid which collects in mouths of persons after death, and which in many cases collects just before death. The numerous manipulations entailed in the removal of the body from the wards to the morgue greatly facilitate the entrance of any fluid from the pharynx and buccal cavity into the lungs. It follows logically, from the results obtained in this experiment, that the cultural findings after death are no guide to the bacterial contents of the lungs during life, and that any deductions made from such findings are unreliable and deceptive. Granted that our explanation be correct, there is every reason to believe that any of the micro-organisms present in the mouths and pharynx and in many cases in the stomach contents may enter the lungs and, if the conditions be suitable, increase in numbers, during the time between death and the examination of the lungs. There exists, perhaps, more frequently than has hitherto been suspected, a series of diplococci, intermediate between the typical pneumococci and streptococci. The diplococci of this type have been found in forty (40) per cent. of our cases. The differential diagnosis of these atypical diplococci from the pneumococci and streptococci is a difficult one, depending, as it does, upon general cultural characteristics. No single character, such as the presence of capsules or the fermentation of inulin, virulence, etc., has been found to be a certain criterion. The few agglutinative reactions we have made seem to show that these intermediate diplococci, those of Groups II, III, and IV, have no or only slight agglutinative affinities to the typical pneumococcus. Further tests must, however, be made with the various methods at our disposal before this statement can be accepted as final. These diplococci are of interest from the fact that they have been found in the blood during life, and in the pial exudate of cases of meningitis, endocarditis, etc. 6. Our studies have thrown no light whatever upon the conditions which determine the onset of lobar pneumonia in apparently healthy persons. Moreover, we have been unable to draw conclusions as to the presence of pneumococci in the lungs during life, or as to the channels by which they gain access thereto.
1. In the course of experiments for obtaining pneumococci from the oral secretions of human individuals, the "plate method" described in this paper was found to be the most reliable method for isolating pneumococci. 2. An alkaline two-per-cent, glucose-serum-agar was regarded as the most favorable medium for the rapid development of colonies of the pneumococcus. 3. The morphological identification of the pneumococcus was made by means of a special capsule-stain. The recognition of the organism was accomplished with precision and reliability when present in the blood and exudate of test animals, and upon the various culture media employed. 4. Pure cultures of pneumococci could by the methods described be obtained within forty-eight hours for inoculation into animals for tests of virulence. 5. Normal persons often harbor the pneumococcus in their mouths. Of the seventy-eight cases examined, thirty-nine showed the presence of the pneumococcus. 6. In a second and larger series of studies on so-called normal cases by means of cultures made from the throat on Loeffler's medium, the organism was detected seventy-one times in 204 examinations, or in 348%. In 145 cases the Streptococcus mucosus capsulatus occurred eight times (5.5%), and the Friedländer bacillus twenty-one times (14.5%). 7. Certain individuals may acquire the pneumococcus in their mouths in the hospital wards, and may continue to harbor it for a considerable period of time. 8. The pneumococcus may persist for days or weeks in the mouths of patients who have recovered from pneumonia. 9. From a study of patients in the hospital wards, certain conclusionsin regard to communicability were drawn. "Normal" individuals, in whose mouths the pneumococcus is repeatedly found to be absent, may acquire the organism by association with pneumonia or "positive normal" cases. The handker-chiefsand dishes of pneumonia and "positive normal" cases are to be regarded as some of the means of transference of the organismfrom person to person. The lips of drinking-cups and the sputum or saliva in sputum cups were found to contain living and virulent pneumococci. 10. Certain characteristic morphological types of the pneumococcuswere regularly met with in this study. These include the following: (1) the typical, (2) the small, (3) the large, (4) the bacillary, and (5) the streptococcus type of the pneumococcus. 11. Pneumococci in the mouths of normal individuals possess the morphological and cultural properties which are characteristic of the same organisms when isolated from other sources. 12. All pneumococci possess the power of fermenting inulin with the formation of acid, even if not in all generations. But this holds true only when the inulin serum-water medium as modified by the writer is used. 13. A certain configuration of the colonies, designated by the term "ring-form," when present is diagnostic of the pneumococcus. 14. The percentage of virulent pneumococci present in the mouths of normal persons was 79; in cases of pneumonia, 77. 15. Pneumococci of the large mucoid type, and giving large mucoid colonies, should be distinguished from the Streptococcus mucosus capsulatus. 16. There are doubtful diplococci of atypical morphology which can be grouped neither with the pneumococci nor with the streptococci, although they possess many features in common with both. 17. The Streptococcus mucosus capsulatus belongs to a group which is related to, but distinct from, the pneumococcus. 18. Morphological characters and animal tests are of greatest value in the identification of the pneumococcus. By the employment of suitable culture media it is possible, in most instances,to recognize the pneumococcus by its morphology alone. The chief cultural tests are the following: the manner of growth upon the serum-glucose-agar, and the modified inulin-serum water, and the appearance of the "ring-type" of colony. 19. All pneumococci, irrespective of their source, were agglutinatedby means of pneumococcus immune serum. 20. An immune pneumococcus serum was found capable of agglutinating various pyogenic streptococci, certain atypical organisms, and several strains of the Streptococcus mucosus capsulatus. 21. The serum of pneumonia patients varied in its power to agglutinate different pneumococci. Some strains were agglutinated, others not. 22. The sera of normal individuals and of normal rabbits possess no agglutinating power for pneumococci, the atypical organisms, certain streptococci, and the Streptococcus mucosus capsulatus.
The work carried on under the auspices of the Medical Commission for the Investigation of Acute Respiratory Diseases, at the Bacteriological Laboratory of the College of Physicians and Surgeons, Columbia University, has consisted principally of a comparative study of the morphology, growth characters, fermentative activities, and agglutination reactions of pneumococci and allied organisms isolated by ourselves and the various workers under the Commission. These organisms were from two chief sources: (a) from the mouth and naso-pharynx of supposedly normal persons and persons suffering from minor inflammations of the naso-pharynx, and (b) from definitely pathologic sources, such as pneumonic sputum, pneumonic lungs, empyaema, the circulating blood of pneumonia patients, septicaemias, meningitis, and various minor lesions, usually due to infection with pneumococci. One of the principal objects of the study was to make a careful comparison, in the light of the most recent knowledge of the biology of the pneumococcus and by the aid of the latest biological and technical methods, of the series of organisms from these two sources, and thus to determine definitely the true nature of pneumococcus-like organisms occurring in the mouths of normal persons. The second and equally important object, ultimately dependent, however, upon the solution of the first, was the determination of the frequency of occurrence of typical pneumococci in the mouths of healthy individuals. The investigations detailed in the present paper have dealt chiefly with the first problem and incidentally with the second, and lead to the following conclusions: (a) That organisms, not to be distinguished by morphological characters or by any physiological peculiarities from true pneumococci derived from pathologic sources, occur with frequency in the mouths of healthy persons and those suffering from slight inflammations of the naso pharynx, and that the only permissible and legitimate conclusion is that these organisms are true pneumococci. (b) That there are other organisms in normal mouths and from pathologic sources that morphologically or by staining reactions are not definitely to be distinguished from pneumococci, and can only be recognized by a careful study of their fermentative activities and agglutination reactions. These organisms are non-inulin fermenters. (c) That the organism known as Streptococcus mucosus is at times found in cultivations from the mouths of apparently healthy individuals, and that, although it shows certain peculiarities distinguishing it from the typical pneumococcus, it is probably very closely related to, and a variety of, this species.
I. In moist sputum kept in the dark at room temperatures the average life of the pneumococcus is eleven days, though considerable variations may be noted in different specimens of sputum. In the same sputum kept at o degrees C. the average life of the organism is thirty-five days. In sputum kept at room temperature and in a strong light the pneumococcus lives less than five days. II. In dried sputum (a) in the dark the pneumococcus lives on an average thirty-five days; (b) in diffuse light, thirty days; (c) in sunlight, less than four hours. III. In powdered sputum even when kept in the dark the death of the pneumococcus takes place in from one to four hours. When exposed to sunlight death occurs within an hour. IV. No important differences were noted in the life of the pneumococcus when dried on glass, tin, or wood. On cloth the life was usually slightly longer than on non-absorbing surfaces. V. Sprayed sputum particles remain in suspension for twenty-four hours, but all masses of a size sufficient to contain bacteria settle at a rate of about 40 cm. per hour. VI. When sputum containing pneumococci is sprayed the organisms rarely survive for more than an hour, and often die in less time. The substance upon which the particles fall makes but little difference in the life of the organism. On cloth a slight prolongation is occasionally noted, due perhaps to the slow drying. VII. The mucus of the sputum exerts a destructive action on the pneumococcus. VIII. Exposure of bacterial spray to sunlight while in suspension results in the destruction of the pneumococcus within half an hour.
IT WILL BE SEEN FROM THE ABOVE THAT WE HAVE STUDIED THE CONDITIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEPOSIT OF CALCAREOUS SALTS: (I) in connection with normal and pathological ossification, and (2) in pathological calcification as exhibited in (a) atheroma of the vessels; (b) calcification of caseating tubercular lesions; (c) calcification of inflammatory new growth, and (d) degenerating tumors; and we have induced experimentally deposits of calcareous salts in the lower animals: (a) within celloidin capsules containing fats and soaps; (b) in the kidney, and (c) in connection with fat necrosis. I. We have found that bone formation and pathological calcareous infiltration are wholly distinct processes. In the former there is no evidence of associated fatty change, and the cells associated with the process of deposition of calcium are functionally active. In the latter there is an antecedent fatty change in the affected areas, and the cells involved present constant evidences of degeneration. The view that would seem to account best for the changes observed in the latter case is that with lowered vitality the cells are unable to utilize the products brought to them by the blood, or which they continue to absorb, so that the normal series of decompositions associated with their metabolism fails to take place and hence they interact among themselves in the cytoplasm with the result that insoluble compounds replace soluble ones. II. Besides the fact that calcification is always preceded by fatty change within the cells, another fact should be emphasized. namely: that combination of the fats present with calcium salts to form calcium soaps tends to occur. The stages immediately preceding these are difficult to follow with anything approaching certainty, perhaps because the earlier stages vary under different conditions. In fat necrosis, for instance, the cells affected are normally storehouses for neutral fats, and as long as they remain healthy neutral fats alone are present in them. When they are subjected to the action of the pancreatic juice with its fat-splitting ferment the cells are killed and coincidently the neutral fats are decomposed, fatty acids being deposited. The fatty acids now slowly combine with the calcium salts. In degenerating lipomata the process would seem to be similar. But in other cases the cells are not obviously fat-containing in the normal state; nevertheless prior to calcification they undergo so-called fatty degeneration, which is really a form of cell degeneration accompanied by fat infiltration. As regards the source of the cell fats in general we may safely accept: 1. That fats are transported in the blood as diffusible soaps. 2. That taken up by the cells these soaps may either- (a) Be reconverted into neutral fats and become stored in the cytoplasm as such, or (b) undergo assimilation proper, becoming part and parcel of the cell substance, in which case they are not recognizable by the ordinary microchemical tests. 3. If these two possibilities be accepted it follows that the appearance of fats and soaps in the degenerating cell may be due to either- (a) Absorption or infiltration of soaps from the surrounding medium, the degenerating cell retaining the power of splitting off the fat but being unable to utilize this in metabolism. (b) Cytoplasmic disintegration with dissociation of the soap-albumen combination or, more broadly, liberation of the fats from their combination with the cytoplasm. The appearances seen in the cells of atheromatous areas indicate that the first of these does occur. III. In areas undergoing calcareous infiltration we have demonstrated. the presence of soaps, and this often in such quantities that they can be isolated and estimated by gross chemical methods. By microchemical methods also we have been able to show that after removing all the neutral fats and fatty acids by petroleum ether there remains behind a substance giving with Sudan III the reaction we associate with the presence of soap. And experimentally we have produced these soaps within the organism, more particularly by placing capsules containing fats and fatty acids within the tissues and after several days finding that the capsules contain calcium soaps and possess a calcium content far in excess of that of the normal blood and lymph. IV. While these are the facts, certain of the details of this reaction demand elucidation. The existence of sodium and it may be potassium soaps in the degenerated cells is comprehensible if we accept that these are present in the circulating lymph and simply undergoing absorption. But even then, as these are diffusible substances how is it to be explained that they become stored up in these particular areas? We have found that, as a matter of fact, in regions which give the reaction for soaps, but which give no reaction for calcium (which therefore presumably contain at most amounts of the insoluble calcium soap too small to need consideration, the ordinary solvents for potassium and sodium soaps do not forthwith remove the stainable material; they are relatively insoluble. The reason for this insolubility is suggested by the observations made in the test tube, that soap solutions mixed with solutions of white of egg or blood serum form a precipitate of combined soap and albumen, which likewise is insoluble in water and alcohol. The indications are therefore that in cells undergoing degeneration, with degeneration of the cytoplasm, certain albuminous molecules unite with the soaps present to form relatively insoluble soap-albuminate. V. With regard to calcium soaps, these are also present and in certain stages appear to be the dominating form in the affected tissues. Two questions suggest themselves, viz.: what is the source of calcium, and what is the process by which they become formed? As to the source, the amount present in well-marked calcification is far in excess of the normal calcium contents of the affected tissue. If in the kidneys of experimental calcification three hundred times as much calcium may be present as in the normal kidney (von Kossa), the calcium must be conveyed to the part by the blood and lymph, and that this is so is demonstrated, as we have pointed out, by the distribution of the infiltration in solid organs, that like ovarian fibroids have undergone necrosis, in which the earliest deposits are superficial. As to the process, there are three possibilities: 1. That sodium and potassium soaps and soap albuminates are first formed and that interaction occurs between them and the diffused calcium salts from the lymph, the less soluble-calcium replacing the sodium and potassium. 2. That under certain conditions the calcium salts act directly on the neutral fats present in the degenerating cells. 3. That the neutral fats are first broken down into fatty acids and that these react with the calcium salts to form the soaps. We are assured that the first process occurs and that because in the boundary zone of areas of calcification we can detect soapy particles devoid of calcium, identical in position and arrangement with the particles more deeply placed which give the calcium reactions. But this is not the only reaction. In case of fat necrosis we see clearly that the third process is in evidence. And we are far from being convinced that the second does not also obtain. We have been impressed by the large accumulation of neutral fats in the cells in cases of early atheroma and the absence at any stage of the process of recognizable fatty acid. While soaps, it is true, are compounds of fatty acids with alkalies, it is recognized in ordinary domestic life that they can be formed by the direct action of strong lye upon ordinary fats, and this even in the cold. It is quite possible therefore that there occurs a similar direct process in the organism. The point is worth noting, however, that this does not occur in healthy cells the seat of fatty infiltration. We therefore leave this an open question, only laying down that, as indicated by the hyalin albuminous matrix left when calcium salts are dissolved out of an area of calcification, there must exist a calcium soap- or fat-albuminate similar to the potassium and sodium soap-albuminates already mentioned-such an albuminate as we can form with calcium soaps in the test tube. VI. In old areas of calcification soaps are largely if not entirely wanting, although these are to be detected at the periphery, when the process is still advancing. The reactions given by these older areas are almost entirely those of calcium phosphate, though some calcium carbonate is at times to be made out. This seems surely to indicate that the final stage in calcification is an interaction between the calcium soap-albuminates and substances containing phosphoric and carbonic acids. Such substances, it is needless to say, are present in considerable amounts in the lymph and blood. We must conclude that the acid sodium phosphates of the lymph act on the calcium soap, the highly insoluble calcium phosphates being formed (plus the albuminous moiety of the original compound) and diffusible sodium soap being liberated, while similarly alkaline carbonates form calcium carbonate and liberate sodium and potassium soaps. Calcium phosphate and calcium carbonate thus become the insoluble earthy salts of old crystalline areas of calcification. VII. As already stated very little soap is to be found in these old areas. It is possibly worth suggestion that the soaps liberated in this last reaction, as they diffuse out, again react with diffusible calcium salts and form calcium soaps which once more react with the alkaline salts to produce the phosphates and carbonates; that, in short, they have a katalytic action. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED)
From the experiments detailed in this paper it may be concluded that Amanita phalloides contains besides phallin, or the haemolytic principle of Kobert, another body of toxic nature. Phallin is thermolabile, and is destroyed by the action of pepsin and pancreatin. The other toxic body is thermostable and is resistant to pepsin and pancreatin. The two substances, moreover, possess different toxophoric and haptophoric groups, since an antiserum produced by the immunization of animals to the thermostable body has no neutralizing effects upon phallin. The thermolable body, phallin, produces the subcutaneous oedema and haemoglobinuria, and, in virtue of its blood-laking properties, the pigmentation of the spleen. The thermostable body produces haemorrhage and necrosis, and the fatty degeneration of the parenchymatous organs. The two bodies exist side by side in watery extracts of the fungus, but they cannot be considered as two constituents of a single poison exerting a variety of effects. To the haemolysin the name phallin has already been given by its discoverer, Kobert. For the thermostable substance described now for the first time, the name Amanito-toxin is proposed provisionally.
In certain animals, in addition to the protoplasmic fibrils of the stratum filamentosum that are present normally in human epidermis, there are well developed fibrils in the cells of the stratum germinativum. These fibrils are present in the human epidermis only under conditions of increased cell activity. These fibrils, that are prominent in the stratum germinativum of human epidermis under conditions of increased cell activity, seem to increase in direct ratio to rapidity of cell production. The differentiation of these fibrils of the stratum germinativum into the finer fibrils which connect the cells of the stratum filamentosum can be observed under proper conditions of growth and therefore there should be no separation of the fibrils into different groups with various names. This process of fibre production by the cells of the human epidermis is analogous to increased fibre production by various other cells under similar conditions, and may be of importance in identifying or classifying new growths of epithelial origin.
1. The facts described in this paper are intended to bear upon the pathogenesis of colitis in man and animals. 2. The toxin of the Shiga dysentery bacillus is liberated from the bacillus through the process of autolysis. 3. In rabbits the toxin is not absorbed directly in an active form by the gastro-intestinal tract; in man, however, absorption of an active poison does take place from the intestine. 4. The toxin is excreted in rabbits, and probably in man as well by the intestine, chiefly probably by the large intestine, which being injured by the act of elimination, reacts by the development of inflammation, etc. 5. In rabbits the characteristic action of the toxin depends upon the integrity of the biliary secretion into the intestine. When the bile is prevented from entering the intestine, either by ligature and section of the duct or by establishment of a biliary fistula, no lesions whatever of the large intestine appear, or they are inconsiderable in extent. 6. The loss of toxin through a biliary fistula does not prevent in rabbits the lethal effects which are caused, apparently, by a nervous poison. The tying off of the bile duct seems to prevent the passage of the toxin, in amounts sufficient to cause the large intestinal lesions, into the blood. The liver, therefore, in this condition tends to hold back the toxin from the general circulation. 7. The peculiar effects of the toxin on the large intestine in rabbits is not produced at once, but would appear to depend upon successive acts of excretion of the poison by the bowel. 8. The establishment of biliary fistula reduces the intensity of action of corrosive sublimate upon the large intestine in rabbits; and the lesions of ricin poisoning in these animals are also modified by this operation. 9. Dysentery toxin is destroyed by peptic digestion, and also, though probably more slowly, by tryptic digestion. The absence of power of the toxin to cause poisoning in rabbits when it is brought directly into the lumen of the intestine, is not explained by the destructive action of trypsin. 10. The character of the histological changes in the caecum of rabbits caused by the dysentery toxin points to an action upon the substance and not primarily upon the surface of the intestine.
Acids, alkalies, salts, glucosides, and certain toxins diffuse more quickly into 0.9 per cent. salt solution than into agar-agar and gelatin suspensions. The inhibitory effect of the colloids grows with increase in concentration, which increase affects both the velocity and extent of the diffusion. In the case of gelatin the degree of diffusion is approximately in inverse proportion to the square root of the concentration. Agar-agar in strengths up to 2 per cent. inhibits far less than gelatin in 10 per cent. suspensions; and the difference in degree of inhibition exercised by 0.5 per cent. and 2 per cent. agar-agar is a small one. Haemolytic substances diffuse from gelatin into agar-agar more slowly than from saline into agar-agar. But the velocity of diffusion from agar-agar into gelatin is greater than from saline into gelatin. The effects of differences in concentration of the haemolytic agent vary according to the agent and the manner of its solution. When the haemolyser is dissolved in salt solution the diffusion of 1/100 N. and 1/1000 N. solutions (saponin) is almost identical; while with solanin the stronger solutions diffuse faster. When the haemolyser is dissolved in the colloid diffusion into fluid media is nearly proportional to the concentrations of the haemolytic agent. The velocity of diffusion into and from colloids is in general proportional to the square root of the time. Acids, alkalies, salts, and glucosides act in a manner which is in agreement with this rule. Cobra lysin and tetanolysin do not act in conformity with the rule. Cobra lysin appears to diffuse into colloids more slowly, proportionally, than cobra neurotoxin, and tetanospasmin more slowly than tetanolysin. The biological method described in this paper for studying diffusion in colloids is applicable to haemolytic and some other toxic substances, and, with accuracy possibly only to such substances possessing relatively simple compositions. Since all diffusion in the living body takes place within colloidal media of different concentrations, it would seem desirable to perfect methods through which the interaction of toxic chemicals and the fluids and cells of the body may in a manner be imitated in vitro. Through this means our knowledge of toxicology may well be extended.
IN ADDITION TO THE RESULTS BROUGHT OUT IN THE SEPARATE SECTIONS I WISH TO DIRECT ESPECIAL ATTENTION TO THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS: (1) In ten cases of Cheyne-Stokes respiration observed clinically, the alternate periods of respiratory activity and apnoea were associated with Traube-Hering waves of blood pressure. These cases may be separated into two groups characterized by the relation of the respiratory changes to the changes of blood pressure. In one group the period of respiratory activity was associated with a rise of blood pressure, the period of apnoea with a fall; in the other group, the reverse relations existed. The former group included two cases of Cheyne-Stokes respiration occurring with increased intracranial tension; the latter contained eight cases with cardiac and arterial disease. (2) By means of cerebral compression, periodic respirations may be produced experimentally, and the relation of the blood pressure changes to the respiratory variations are the same as in the clinical cases with increased intracranial tension, namely, a rise of pressure with each group of respirations and a fall with each period of apnoea. In the experiments, during each respiratory group, the blood pressure rises above the line of intracranial tension and with each period of apnoea it falls below this line. With the disappearance of this relation, the periodicity of the respirations likewise disappears. It is probable that the same relation between the blood pressure and intracranial pressure exists when Cheyne-Stokes respiration occurs clinically in association with increased intracranial tension. (3) Disappearance of the periodic respiratory activity in the clinical cases of both groups is accompanied by disappearance of the waves of blood pressure. (4) The waves of blood pressure cannot be regarded as a mechanical effect of the periodic respiratory activity; on the contrary the latter must be due to the changes of blood pressure, or both phenomena may be referable to a common cause. (5) Cheyne-Stokes respiration in states of increased intracranial tension, with blood pressure waves rising and falling above and below the line of intracranial tension, is due to periodic activity of the respiratory, vasomotor, and cardio-inhibitory centres, the underlying cause of which is an alternate anaemia and blood supply to the medullary centres. The vasomotor centre, as the result of periodic increase and decrease of the stimulus, shows periodic variations in its activity. It is stimulated to greater activity during the periods of anaemia, and partially relaxes with each period of blood supply. During the periods of anaemia, the respiratory centre loses its irritability for the acting stimulus, and is therefore apnoeic. It is finally stimulated to activity, either as a result of an increase in its irritability from a preceding rise of blood pressure, or from a great increase in the respiratory stimulus. The cardio-inhibitory centre is stimulated by the periods of anaemia. This stimulation causes slowing of the pulse, which passes off to a considerable extent with the following period of blood supply. (6) Cheyne-Stokes respiration has heretofore been regarded as always the manifestation of the same conditions and capable of the same explanation; the results of this work, on the contrary, show that two distinct groups of cases may be recognized, depending upon the relation of the blood pressure changes to the periodic respiratory activity.(19) (7) The medullary centres show great differences in their susceptibility to anaemia. The respiratory centre is very susceptible to a much reduced blood supply; its irritability is rapidly reduced or lost upon the occurrence of marked or complete anaemia, and is rapidly regained when the blood supply is renewed if the anaemia has not been maintained too long. The effect of a considerable anaemia upon this centre is entirely different from that of a normal or somewhat reduced supply of blood which is more venous than normal, that is, contains more carbon dioxide and less oxygen, such as occurs with ordinary asphyxia. The vasomotor and cardio-inhibitory centres are not nearly so susceptible to anaemia. The former centre may, and frequently does, respond when in a condition of complete anaemia. (8) I am able to confirm, as a result of my experiments upon cerebral compression, in all essential details the conclusions of Cushing, and the general law formulated by him, namely that "an increase of intracranial tension occasions a rise of blood pressure which tends to find a level slightly above that of the pressure exerted against the medulla."
1. The action of different antivenins is highly, although not absolutely, specific for the venoms for which they are prepared. The antivenomous effect is demonstrable by experiments on toxicity (in vivo) and on haemolysis (in vitro). 2. Anticrotalus and antimoccasin sera possess therapeutic properties of high degree. By their employment before the stage of extreme prostration has been reached, poisoned guinea-pigs can be saved. 3. The standardization of antivenins must be made separately for the antitoxic and antihaemolytic actions, since these do not bear a constant and invariable relation to each other.
Intraspinal injections of magnesium sulphate, in doses which do not affect the respiratory centre or other vital function, are capable of abolishing completely all clonic convulsions and tonic contractions in cases of human tetanus, and experimental tetanus in monkeys. The relaxing effects of the injections may last twenty-four hours or longer. In experimental tetanus in monkeys early intraspinal injections of magnesium salts are capable of retarding the progress and development of the tetanic symptoms.
Blood serum contains normally certain principles which inhibit serum haemolysis by interfering with the action of complement. In the case of most sera the anticomplementary action appears only after heating to 56 degrees C. or higher. The inhibiting action of this principle is directed against alien as well as native complements, and is non-specific in character. It would appear as if the inactivation of serum at 50 degrees C. or thereabouts were due to a partial liberation of the antilytic principle which just about suffices to neutralize the action of the native complement. As the temperature of the serum is raised, up to a certain point, more and more of the antilysin is set free until the serum comes to contain an overplus, in excess of the quantity neutralizing its own complement, which is capable of interfering with the action of additional native or alien complements. Serum heated to 90 degrees C. is less antilytic than serum heated to 70 degrees C., either because the antilysin has entered into new, more stable compounds which prevent its action, or, as is more probable, because of the liberation from the serum of a second group of principles in themselves haemolytic directly, or indirectly by increasing the power of serum haemolysins (auxilysins). This latter action tends to mask and to suppress the inhibitory influences of the antilysin. The antilysin is removed from serum by digestion with many kinds of blood corpuscles which, apparently, absorb the principle. While, by reason of this treatment, the serum is deprived of its inhibitory power, the corpuscles have acquired greater resistance to serum haemolysins. By treating blood serum and corpuscles with ether the antilysin can be extracted. The ethereal extract, freed from lecithin and certain related bodies, contains the antilysin in a concentrated but not in a pure form, which can now be taken up in saline solution in which it dissolves. The saline solution of the antilysin, which for convenience has been denominated "protectin," behaves in all respects like the native antilytic sera except that it is uninfluenced by temperatures of 90 degrees C. or even higher temperatures. Protectin inhibits serum haemolysis directly by neutralizing complement and indirectly after absorption by corpuscles by increasing their resistance. Hence it is highly probable that the antilytic principle of heated serum and protectin extracted from serum and corpuscles are the same substance. Thermostability is one of the characteristic properties of protectin. Serum and corpuscles, first dried, may be heated to 150 degrees C. without losing the protecting principle, and the principle persists in such heated products for at least two years. Protectin in solution is unaffected by a temperature of 100 degrees C. maintained for one hour, and suffers only slight reduction in activity at the expiration of two hours; while temperatures ranging from 135 degrees to 150 degrees C. bring about marked reduction in protective power. As these alterations are produced by high temperatures the reaction of the solution changes from acid, through neutral, to alkaline.
1. Bacillus malleiand its poison produce a variety of vascular lesions in the rabbit and the guinea pig. 2. The type of the lesion depends upon, (a) the virulence of the culture, (b) the sex of the animal and (c) the degree of acquired immunity. 3. The vascular changes of a proliferative and degenerative nature produced by the slow action of the glanders poison in rabbits and guinea pigs are analogous to the vascular lesions caused by sub-acute glanders infection in man. 4. The most common site of the glanders vascular lesions of animals and man is the peripheral vessels, and especially the smaller visceral arteries. 5. The aorta is a less common site of the experimental lesions. 6. The vascular lesions produced experimentally by Bacillus mallei and its poison consist of three processes, (a) exudation, (b) proliferation, (c) degeneration. 7. The lesions produced by sub-acute glanders in man consist of two processes, proliferation and degeneration. 8. The primary reaction of the vessels in experimental animals and in sub-acute human glanders consists of a proliferation of the endothelium of the intima. 9. The first degenerative changes observed in experimental animals and in sub-acute human glanders occur in the "innermost layer" of the media and not in the so-called " middle zone." 10. The cause of the degenerative change in the inner layer of the media appears to be interference with the nourishment of the circular muscle fibres of the media by proliferation of the endothelium of the intima.
The injection of rabbits' placenta into rabbits produces no isoprecipitins. From the incomplete experiments performed it would appear that placental injections into animals of the same species cause no changes in the generative organs. Further research into this question will be pursued. The injection of human placental nucleo-proteid, prepared from placental tissue made nearly blood free, does not produce an antiserum. This result confirms the conclusions of Pearce and Jackson, that nucleo-proteids act merely as mild toxic agents, without specific qualities. The injection, into rabbits, of human placental tissue, rendered practically blood-free, fails to produce any specific reaction. This confirms the view that the serum reaction following the injection of cells into a foreign organism is largely due to the blood contained in the injected tissues. The injection into rabbits, of the human placenta, made nearly blood-free, produces a weak " human reaction " which can be demonstrated by the reactions for precipitin, deflection of complement, agglutinin, and hemolysis. No specific placental reaction can be shown. This is in strict accord with the view that cytotoxines are not specific; that there is no morphological specificity. The anti-sera obtained showed no cytolytic action; therefore no specific syncytiolytic action could be demonstrated. If the information obtained in this investigation is applied to the theory of Halban, it will be noted that no experimental proof of the specific action of placental tissue upon the female generative organs could be demonstrated. The number of experiments performed, bearing upon this one point, were however too few to permit of a definite and final opinion. The work dealing with Veit's ingenious hypothesis was more complete and carried out by many methods, which would necessarily act as a check upon one another. As the results of all these experiments were in complete harmony, I feel justified in making a positive statement that no experimental proof of a specific placental immune reaction can be demonstrated by our present biological methods. Whether Veit's hypothesis, thus deprived of its biological proof, must in consequence be discarded, is a question which I do not consider myself competent to answer.
Eosin, if present in cultures containing tetanus spores, prevents the germination of these spores when its concentration (in glucose bouillon) reaches 0.2 per cent. When the concentration of the eosin sinks to 0.01 per cent., germination of the spores is no longer inhibited, but the vegetative bacilli developed from the spores execute a highly restrained form of multiplication. When the eosin concentration sinks to 0.001 per cent., vegetation and multiplication of the bacilli become more active, but no new spores are formed even after long periods of time. With glucose agar it is not until the concentration of the eosin in the cultures falls to .05 per cent. that sporulation again appears. At this concentration of the eosin, very few spores are formed ; but as the eosin sinks lower and lower, sporulation becomes more active, until with 0.001 per cent. it is essentially of normal degree. In concentrations of 0.003 per cent., eosin prevents perfect segmentation of the multiplying bacilli, with the result that, finally, long and convoluted threads of bacilli are produced. The spores which are formed in a medium containing 0.01 per cent. of eosin are often situated at the centre and not at one pole of the bacilli. Eosin in a strength of 2 per cent. is capable of destroying the vegetative bacilli, if the contact is prolonged to fifteen minutes, and in strength of 0.1 per cent., in twenty-four hours. Placing this latter mixture of bacilli and eosin in the sunlight greatly hastens the bactericidal effect, and the bacilli are found to be incapable of growth at the end of several hours. Eosin in high concentrations is not capable of killing the tetanus spores, even after long exposure to sunlight (thirty hours). The toxin production of tetanus bacilli grown in eosinized culture media diminishes as the concentration of the eosin increases. This effect is brought about partly by the restraining action of the dye on vegetation, and partly by its detoxicating action upon the poison., The toxin-producing power and the virulence of tetanus bacilli are not permanently modified by contact with eosin for a long period, or by successive cultivations in eosinized media. Eosin is likewise capable of restraining the vegetation of tetanus spores in the animal body. In spore threads inserted beneath the skin of rats, and surrounded with eosin in solution, a very restricted vegetation takes place. If the injections of eosin are repeated. vegetation soon ceases and the vegetated bacilli degenerate and disappear. The ungerminated tetanus spores remain alive in a latent condition indefinitely in the healed wound beneath the skin. These spores do not lose power to grow outside the body, or inside the body of animals under favorable conditions, or to produce toxin in a characteristic manner.
A histological study of six cases of myeloma shows a striking similarity of cell structure with differences of minor degree. The common characteristics of the cells are a finely granular, slightly basophilic cytoplasm, an eccentrically placed nucleus, a nucleolus, centrosomes, a nuclear membrane and a tendency to mural arrangement of the chromatin. With these characteristics there is a greater resemblance of the tumor cells to bone marrow plasma cells than to myelocytes. In most of the cases reported by other observers the cells show these characteristics and these tumors form a group within which the cells of individual cases show no greater variation than occurs in other tumor groups.
The bacillus of glanders may be so modified in virulence as to produce experimentally lesions differing widely in their histological features. The highly virulent culture causes primary necrosis and disintegration of the tissue followed by the invasion of the injured area by polymorphonuclear leucocytes. The bacilli of moderate virulence give rise to a primary lesion of an acute inflammatory nature in which the cells show no evidence of necrosis or disintegration. The attenuated bacilli produce primary tissue proliferation with the formation of epithelioid and giant cells. There is every grade of lesion between the acute exudative and the chronic proliferative depending upon the toxicity of the cultures. The glanders lesion whether exudative or proliferative is focal in character. The strong toxins of the glanders bacilli cause degeneration or necrosis of cells and exudation, while the dilute and weak toxins produce proliferation. The giant cell of glanders undoubtedly originates from the endothelial cell of the blood and lymph channels and is formed by division of the nucleus of the endothelial cell and not by cell fusion. Histologically the lesion of glanders resulting from the culture of a low degree of virulence is proliferative and is analogous to tuberculosis; the lesions are focal and bear an intimate relation to the glanders bacillus.
From these results it is permissible to draw the following conclusions which may be used to explain certain phenomena associated especially with the onset of acute pancreatitis. 1. The sudden marked collapse of acute pancreatitis has as its most important cause a toxin or toxins derived from broken down pancreatic tissue. This toxin or toxins seem to be most powerful in the stage of degradation just after the disappearance of the biuret reaction and are probably of the nature of aromatic and amino-compounds. 2. There are various contributing factors of toxic action as peptone and trypsin, but these are to be regarded as of secondary importance. 3. Mechanical irritation as stretching of the peritoneum and irritation of the caeliac plexus is a secondary cause. 4. The glycerine produced through the action of steapsin cannot be regarded as an important cause of collapse.
Fibrinous pleurisy produced by a sterile inflammatory irritant offers opportunity for study of the part taken by enzymes of leucocytes in the resolution of a fibrinous exudate. When turpentine is injected into the subcutaneous tissue of the dog, an abscess results, but when an equal quantity of turpentine is injected into the pleural cavity, there is abundant exudation of coagulable fluid and the serous surfaces are covered by a layer of fibrin. Accumulation of fluid which can be followed during life by percussion of the animal's chest reaches a maximum at the end of three days, and then gradually subsides, so that at the end of six days, in most instances, the cavity contains no fluid. Fibrin, though diminished in amount at the time when fluid has been absorbed, is still present, and gradually disappears; at the end of two or three weeks the cavity has returned to the normal, save for a few organized adhesions. Turpentine injected into the right pleural cavity may cause serofibrinous pleurisy on the left side; this inflammation may reach a maximum intensity at a time when pleurisy on the right side is subsiding. During the early stage of inflammation fibrinous exudate, freed from the serum by washing in salt solution, undergoes digestion when suspended in an alkaline (0.2 per cent. sodium carbonate) or in an acid medium (0.2 per cent. acetic acid). At the end of five days, at a time when fluid is disappearing from the pleural cavity, digestion fails to occur in an alkaline medium, but occurs with much activity in the presence of acid. During the first stage of the inflammatory reaction, when fluid is abundant and the fibrin which is present digests in alkali, thus indicating the presence of leucoprotease, polynuclear leucocytes are very numerous in the meshes of the fibrin. In the second stage, the exuded fibrin contains only one enzyme digesting in the presence of acid. At this time polynuclear leucocytes have disappeared and only mononuclear cells are embedded in the fibrin. Products of proteolytic digestion, namely, peptone and albumose, absent in the exuded fluid during the first day or two days of inflammation, are present after three days and are found in less quantity at a later period. The exuded fluid does not at any stage of the inflammatory reaction lose it spower to inhibit both enzymes contained in the leucocytes. The exudate remains alkaline throughout the period of inflammation, but its alkalinity is less than that of the blood and diminishes slightly with the progress of inflammation. Since the acids, which in vitro favor the action of the enzyme, present alone during the second stage of the inflammatory reaction, do not occur in the body, the possibility has suggested itself that carbon-dioxide brings this enzyme into action. If carbon-dioxide is passed through normal salt solution in which strips of such fibrin are suspended, digestion is greatly hastened. The normal inhibition exerted by blood serum upon the enzyme is overcome by carbon-dioxide and in the presence of a small quantity of blood serum, carbon-dioxide causes greater enzymotic activity than in the presence of salt solution alone.
If we glance again at the classification proposed by Andrewes and Horder we are struck at once by the fact that no hard and fast differences in fermentative properties characterize the various groups, and that the authors prefer to have recourse to the most frequent habitat of the organisms and to chemical tests, rather than to confine themselves to the latter method alone. From what has been said earlier in this paper, it becomes clear at once that the results gained by these authors are not convincing, for in their work they have failed to use the most favorable medium for growth of the organisms. And thus it can hardly be doubted that different reactions might have been obtained, under the conditions adopted by us. How otherwise could the fact be explained that of thirty-four of their pneumococci only eight fermented inulin. We had a similar experience while using the plain broth which led us to reject it as an unfavorable medium. Further, all our pneumococci fermented lactose with great rapidity. Andrewes and Horder report that eight of their series left lactose unchanged. Taking our own tests into consideration we find that working with but a small number of carbohydrates we were able to find six different varieties of streptococci among only 33 pathogenic strains. Which of the various substances is to decide us in the grouping of the organisms? Would we not find even greater variations from the most common type (see No. 4 in table) if we were to extend our tests over a larger series of chemical agents? These questions are difficult to answer and only extended experimentation with a great many streptococci and many media will clear up the doubtful points. In concluding it may be stated: 1. Streptococci vary considerably in their ability to produce acid from various carbohydrates. 2. Chemical tests of this kind should be made only in the media which are most favorable for the growth of the organisms. 3. Our results gave us six groups of streptococci, when tested upon dextrose, levulose, galactose, maltose, saccharose, lactose, inulin, dextrin and mannite, viz.: Those fermenting (1) all; (2) all but mannite; (3) all but inulin; (4) all but inulin and mannite; (5) all but inulin and lactose; and (6) all but inulin, mannite and saccharose. 4. In view of the comparatively small number of streptococci employed we are hardly warranted in making a definite classification. Perhaps a larger series of tests upon the media employed will enable us to divide streptococci into distinct classes characterized by certain fixed fermentative properties.
In normal serums of the majority of mammalian and avian blood there exists certain substances capable of activating venom haemolysin. They are extractable from serum by means of ether, and are capable of conferring upon the originally non-activating serum a power to activate venom, when mixed with the latter. The ethereal extract consists of fatty acids, neutral fats and possibly also some ether soluble organic soaps. The fatty acids and soaps, especially of the oleinic series, acquire certain characteristics of complements in general, when they are mixed with serum. They are inactive without the venom in the mixture; they are inactivable with calcium chloride; they exhibit a tendency to go off in activity with age; they are inactive or only weakly active at 0 degrees C., and they are extractable by ether. In testing the serum from which the ether soluble substances are removed, it is found that no venom activating property is left. Warm alcoholic extraction of such serum yields, however, a large quantity of lecithin. In the case of non-activating serums no venom activating fats appear in the ethereal extract. Lecithin exists in such serum in no less quantity than in the activating kind. The addition of oleinic acid or its soluble soaps to a non-activating serum, in a ratio which corresponds to the percentage of fatty acids or soaps contained in some of the easily activating serums, will make the serum highly active in regard to venom. In normal serum of dog there exists, besides the group of activators already mentioned, another kind of venom activators which has been identified as a lecithin compound acting in the manner of free lecithin. A very sharp differentiation of the haemolysis produced by this activator and by the other groups of activators is obtained by means of calcium chloride, which is powerless against lecithin or lecithin compounds, but effective in removing the action of the latter. This lecithin containing proteid can be precipitated by half saturation with ammonium sulphate, but is perfectly soluble in water, and is not coagulated in neutral alkaline salt solutions upon boiling. Alcohol precipitates a proteid-like coagulum and extracts lecithin from it; ether does not extract lecithin from this compound. Non-activating serums do not contain any such lecithin compound. Lecithin contained in other serum proteids, mainly as lecithalbumin, and perhaps as contained in globulin, is not able to activate venom. This is true of all the serums with which I worked; it matters not whether these fractions (obtained with ammonium sulphate) belong to the most activating serum (dog) or to the non-activating serum (ox). The non-coagulable portion of all heated serum contains a venom activator of the nature of lecithin. This activator is contained in a non-coagulable proteid described by Howell which is identical with Chabrie's albumon. As there is no ether-extractable lecithin in this portion of the serum, the activating property of heated serum must be due to this proteid compound of lecithin. That this lecithin proteid does not pre-exist in normal serum but is produced by the action of high temperature is true of all serums except that of the dog. In venom activation we know now that lecithin becomes reactive with venom when it is transformed from other proteid compounds into the non-coagulable form, the albumon. Howell's view of the non-existence of the non-coagulable proteid in normal serum seems to receive a biological support from venom haemolysis. Ovovitellin derived from hen's egg is one of the best venom activators of the lecithin proteid type. The cause of venom susceptibility of various kinds of blood corpuscles does not depend upon the existence of lecithin in the corpuscles, but solely upon the amount of fatty acids, and perhaps, also, soaps and fats, contained in the corpuscles. The protection which calcium chloride gives against venom haemolysis is proof of the absence of lecithin activation. From the stroma of susceptible corpuscles fatty acids or some fats can be extracted with ether. After ethereal extraction the stroma becomes non-activating, while the extract contains fatty acids and some soaps or fats, which when added to venom-resistant corpuscles render the latter vulnerable to venom. The corpuscular solution of non-activating corpuscles does not contain enough fatty acids. The larger the amount of fatty acids and soaps in the corpuscles, the easier the cells undergo venom haemolysis. Lecithin exists in the strorna of all kinds of corpuscles, but in a form unavailable for venom activation. The somatic cytolytic processes caused by venom requires intracellular complements. The experiments performed on the cells of liver, kidney, testis and brain of the guinea-pig and rat indicate that the substances which act as complements are inactivable by calcium chloride.
Opsonins reveal their maximum action in a medium of neutral reaction. No opsonization takes place in a serum which contains an amount of alkali corresponding to more than 1.6 c.c. of a 1/20 N. solution, or acid more than 0.5 c.c. of this concentration per 1 c.c. of serum. Of several normal blood serums titrated (lacmoid used as indicator) the average alkalinity was found to be equivalent to about 0.8 c.c. of 1/20 N. solution. The opsonic index obtained in the native serums is not the expression of the action of the whole content of opsonins, but only so much as the degree of optimum of the reaction permits to come into action. Estimation of the opsonic power should, therefore, be made in a medium of neutral reaction and in diluted serum. All serums have their opsonic power increased by diminishing the native alkalinity. Opsonins whose activity is suspended by an unfavorable reaction become immediately active as soon as the reaction is brought back to the neutral point, unless the acid or alkali employed approaches the strength of 1 N., at which point the alteration becomes permanent. Treatment of a serum with alcohol robs it of its opsonic power. The opsonic power of serum remains unaltered upon desiccation at 23 degrees C. In the dry state opsonins are preserved for two years. The temperatures of 100 degrees , 120 degrees , 135 degrees and 150 degrees C. do not destroy opsonins of the dried serum. Complements of serum are also siccostabile and are preservable in that state for several months. Dry heat of 135 degrees C. reduces but does not destroy the complementary power of the dried serum. The opsonins and complements of the dried serum regain their original thermolability when they are dissolved in a proper amount of water. Lastly, it may be emphasized that opsonins exhibit in their sensitiveness to reaction and resistance in the dry state to high temperatures certain properties characteristic of the ferments.
1. The determination of Wright's index of the opsonic content of the blood and other fluids of the body is open to serious and in part unavoidable errors and should be abandoned in its present form. 2. Conclusions based upon the determination of the opsonic content of the blood, according to Wright's method, are accordingly not uniformly reliable. 3. The percentage index is a valuable check on Wright's bacillary index, but likewise does not furnish an adequate idea of the opsonic content of the blood, unless carried out with progressive dilutions to the point of opsonic extinction. 4. The opsonins of normal blood serum are not specific. 5. The specificity of the opsonins in "immune" sera has not been satisfactorily established, but appears probable. 6. An opsonic immunity, in the sense of a continued high opsonic content of the blood does not exist. 7. In the blood and exudates of infected individuals substances may be present which exercise an inhibitory effect upon phagocytosis.
1. The liver of the dog in which necrosis has been produced by injection of haematoxic immune sera is characterized in the less marked forms by a storing up of nitrogen in the persisting living cells, while in the diffuse forms the total nitrogen content is but slightly above the normal. This last is to be explained by the great diminution in persisting liver substance which limits the power of nitrogen accumulation. 2. In all forms of necrosis there occurs an absolute increase of nitrogen precipitable by phosphotungstic acid (hexon bases) but the percentage increase, in relation to total nitrogen, diminishes in those forms (focal) in which the products of autolysis may be readily carried off by the blood stream and greatly increases in the diffuse form with large areas in which the circulation is seriously impaired. 3. Although the absolute amount of nitrogen representing arginin and histidin varies, a relative increase is evident when this fraction is compared with the total diamino-nitrogen. This increase corresponds to the degree of necrosis and attendant circulatory disturbance and indicates that in necrosis as opposed to degeneration (Wakeman) arginin is not split up by arginase. The lysin also bears a definite relation to the total hexon nitrogen. 4. The diamino-nitrogen of the normal liver after autolysis in vitro shows a slight variable increase over that of the unautolyzed, while the necrotic livers showed a decided decrease. 5. The diamino-acid nitrogen of normal horse liver is only about one half of that of the dog; the relative proportion of the bases is about the same. In necrotic livers with amyloid the diamino-nitrogen is markedly increased which is in accord with Neuberg's observations on the high hexon base content of amyloid.
1. The presence of blood serum has a decided inhibitory effect on autolysis. Thus in the normal unwashed organs the non-coagulable nitrogen increase was 100 to 300 per cent., while in the washed it amounted to 450 per cent. The washed necrotic livers showed an increase of from 600 to 850 per cent., while that of the unwashed necrotic was only slightly above the normal unwashed. 2. While the initial amount of non-coagulable nitrogen varies it is greater in those livers showing the more extensive forms of necrosis. The final amount of autolysis is also greatest in livers of this type. As regards the rate of autolysis fifty per cent. of the total occurs in the first day in the normal and in all types of lesions both washed and unwashed. The maximum is usually reached on the third day in the unwashed, while in the washed there is a continued increase to the eighth day. At this time in the necrotic livers about two to three times as much of the total nitrogen is in the form of non-coagulable nitrogen as in the normal. 3. In the necrotic tissue the initial controls show the content of monamino-acids, with one exception, to be practically doubled. In the washed necrotic the final amount is seventy per cent. of the total nitrogen against forty-six to fifty-seven per cent. in the washed normal. In all cases the monamino-acid nitrogen runs parallel to the nitrogen in non-coagulable form, but in relation to the total nitrogen it shows a greater increase in the washed than in the unwashed organs. 4. The ammonia production in the necrotic livers as shown by the partition experiments is greater than that in the normal and this increase corresponds to that of the non-coagulable nitrogen. In the experiments concerning the absolute production of ammonia in the presence of serum a greater amount was produced in the two and five hours' lesions than in the normal livers. On the other hand, the forty-eight hour diffuse necrosis equaled the normal and the focal fell below. 5. Arginase was obtained from normal but could not be isolated from necrotic livers. 6. No constant relation could be demonstrated between the anatomical lesion in the liver and the presence of leucin and tyrosin in the urine. Leucin was found occasionally in the urine, but none in the liver. On the other hand, tyrosin was constantly present in livers with diffuse but rarely in those with focal necrosis. In the instances of diffuse necrosis in which the liver and urine of the same animal were examined tyrosin was found in both. 7. The presence of large amounts of proteoses in the necrotic liver indicates that the elimination of these substances (colloidal nitrogen of Salkowski) under such circumstances may account for a part of the total nitrogen of the urine usually attributed to the monamino-acids.
1. In focal and diffuse necroses of the liver due to haemotoxic sera there occurs an increased elimination of total nitrogen with a corresponding augmented output of urea. The ammonia excretion becomes slightly diminished at first, but later rises somewhat above normal. The undetermined nitrogen is markedly increased. 2. In diffuse degeneration with no necrosis on the other hand only a slightly increased output of total nitrogen is evident. A rearrangement of the urea-ammonia proportion occurs in that the ammonia excretion is augmented while the urea elimination is correspondingly diminished. The undetermined nitrogen rises but little. 3. In control experiments with normal serum no effect is produced. 4. These results would appear to indicate that in lesions characterized by uniform degeneration of the liver parenchyma, in contradistinction to necrosis, there occurs no increased nitrogen elimination but merely a disturbance of the urea-forming function of the cell without the appearance in the urine of products of autolysis. On the other hand in necrosis, of even considerable extent, the total-nitrogen is greatly augmented, as is also the rest-nitrogen; while the production of urea, on account of the persistence of normally functioning liver cells, remains relatively unchanged. This "factor of safety"(32) possessed by the liver is, we think, one of the most important results brought out in this investigation and must be given great weight in any consideration of the chemistry of hepatic disturbances.
In necrosis of the liver of the dog produced by haemotoxic immune sera, the increased excretion of uric acid, purin bases and inorganic phosphorus pentoxide is the result of the hydrolysis of nuclear material occurring during the autolysis of the necrotic tissue.
1. Changes which occur in the fat content of the liver of dogs receiving haemotoxic serum bear no relation to the degree of necrosis produced by this serum. 2. An increase in water content of the tissue seldom occurs, but where present is due to the nitrogenous autolysis rather than to the deposition of fat. 3. The appearance of fat in the cell is not associated with a decomposition of the proteid component of the compound fats, but rather to a simple splitting off of the fatty radical. This is shown by the slight variations occurring in the percentage nitrogen of the fat-free substance. 4. The iodine equivalent diminishes as the fat content increases. This would indicate that in the fatty changes which occur, fats other than those containing oleate radicals make their appearance. 5. The ratio of phosphorus to nitrogen in the alcohol-chloroform extract remains practically constant in all degrees of necrosis. Hence the substances of the protagon and jecorin type hold the same relation to the lecithins during the autolysis as they do normally. 6. In a general way it may be said that the results obtained in the microchemical staining of the fats with Scharlach R agree with those found by chemical extraction methods.
The most marked differences, exclusive of pathogenic effects in man, between gonococcus and Diplococcus intracellulans are cultural ones, and consist chiefly in abundance of growth and choice of medium. Relatively larger doses of gonococci than of diplococci are required to kill young guinea-pigs, but the lesions are very similar in the two cases, and both organisms lose pathogenic power rapidly when cultivated artificially. Agglutinins, aggressins, protective power, and the amboceptors developed in the serum of immunized animals seem to be largely common to both diplococcus and gonococcus. Neither other Gram negative cocci nor Streptococcus pyogenes have any receptors in common with intracellularis and gonococcus.
1. None of the extracts examined are very potent in small doses. A noticeable effect, however, is produced upon the blood pressure by the extract of fifteen milligrams of shark testis. 2. A small dose of a five per cent. shark testis extract seems to show more pressor action than a larger dose of the same solution. 3. The fall of blood-pressure is due to a vaso-dilation. 4. After repeated (seven or eight) injections of almost any extract, an injection of more of the same extract, or of another extract, which would be rather potent as a "first" injection, causes very little if any response from the blood-pressure. 5. Continued boiling of an extract destroys the pressor substance. 6. The depressor action is then very pronounced and especially prolonged. 7. The depressor substance will dialyze. 8. The pressor and depressor substances cannot be separated by dialysis, because in the repeated sterilizations the pressor substance disappears. 9. The pressor and depressor substances cannot be separated by absolute alcohol, as each seems to be soluble. The solubility is not, however, very great, at least in the cold. 10. It seems impossible to separate the pressor and depressor substances by means of a difference in solubility in cold physiological salt solution, since the depressor substance is even more soluble in that solution than the pressor. And yet the depressor substance is not nearly all removed by this means, even though it is allowed to stand for some time. 11. After cutting the vagi, the recovery from the effect of the depressor substance is much more rapid than with the vagi intact. The amount of fall of blood-pressure is about equal in either case. 12. Extracts of the testis and pancreas of shark; of the testis and spleen of swordfish; and the spiral valve of dogfish show the presence of a pressor substance. 13. Extracts of the testis, spleen, pancreas and liver of shark; of the testis, liver, spleen and kidney of swordfish, and the spiral valve of dogfish show the presence of a depressor substance. 14. Extracts of shark ovary gave no result. I believe, however, that if sufficient of the parenchymatous tissue of the ovary had been obtained a result would have been given by this organ also.
From the liver of a young man who died of typical, " idiopathic" acute yellow atrophy of the liver, after an illness of six weeks, there were isolated and identified the following amino acids: Histidin, lysin, tyrosin, leucin, glycocoll, alanin, prolin, glutaminic acid, aspartic acid. These were found free in extracts of the liver, and presumably represent products of the autolysis of liver cells, although the amount of soluble non-protein nitrogen present in the extracts was so large as to suggest that there must be some other source for these substances. Small quantities of free proteoses and peptones, and of xanthin and hypoxanthin, were also found in the extracts. In the insoluble proteins of the liver the proportion of diamino acids was decreased slightly as compared with normal livers. The proportion of protein phosphorus was increased, probably because of active regenerative proliferation, while the sulphur was normal in amount. Iron was increased because of the large quantity of blood in the liver and the hematogenous pigmentation of the liver cells. Gelatigenous material was increased both absolutely and relatively, because of the loss of parenchyma and the proliferation of the stroma. The proportion of water to solids was much increased, there having been a loss of over two-thirds of the entire parenchymatous elements of the liver. The amount of fat, lecithin and cholesterin was not far from that normal for the liver.
1. Eosinate of thionin gives very satisfactory staining for blood smears. It is easily prepared and dissolves readily in methylated spirits. 2. In the methods heretofore employed for making mixtures of eosin and methylene blue derivatives, the eosinates of methylene violet and methylene azure are present in very small quantities or are altogether absent. 3. Thionol and thionin are probably formed in methylene blue which has been long boiled with dilute alkalies and silver oxide. 4. Good stains of eosin and methylene blue derivatives can be obtained by a variety of manipulations. 5. Methylated spirits is more economical as a solvent for this stain and better adapted for the simple technique above described than is methyl alcohol. There is some evidence that the staining act is of a chemical nature.
IN CONCLUSION WE MAY SUMMARIZE THE ABOVE BIOLOGICAL OBSERVATIONS IN A SERIES OF THESES AS FOLLOWS: 1. Cancer cells differ from other epithelial cells in respect to: (a) Size relations of nucleus and cell body; (b) power of indefinitely continued division. 2. Cancer cells differ from embryonic cells in absence of: (a) power of differentiation; (b) power of coördination of parts to whole; (c) power of self-regulation and limit of growth. 3. The continued development of the cancer cells is subject to the following factors: (a) the inherent potential of division of the cancer cells. (b) The natural resistance of the inoculated animals. The latter factor is usually regarded as the index of malignancy of a tumor and is based upon the percentage of takes together with the period required to kill the mice. Our experiments, however, show that the percentage of takes is independent of the time factor, and indicate the presence of a third factor which may be described as (c) the potential of "infectivity" of the cancer cells. 4. The potential of infectivity of cancer cells is characterized by more or less regular rhythms; these must be distinguished from rhythms of growth energy of the cancer cells which in all probability occur within the individual mouse. Without the division energy of the cancer cell this infectivity is inoperative, hence it follows that the cause of the infectivity lies within the cancer cell or is constantly associated with it. 5. Cancer cells differ from epithelial cells by virtue of this potential of infectivity combined with that of division energy. There is reason to believe that the latter is due to the action of stimuli and not to the liberation of a restrained growth power of embryonic tissue. There is reason to doubt that an initial and discontinued stimulus is responsible for these attributes of the cancer cells. Certain benign tumors, or vegetable galls, may be due to the action of such initial stimuli, but in them there is no infectivity. Embryonic tumors, due to embryonic cells, have a high power of differentiation combined with their division energy, but there is no infectivity. Infectivity distinguishes all cancerous growths from normal epithelium and from benign tumors or teratomata. 6. The rhythms of infectivity of cancer cells, erroneously regarded as rhythms of growth energy by Bashford, Murray and Boyen, appearing as they do in successive batches of mice which we may legitimately assume to have like powers of resistance, must have their cause in the cancer cells themselves. These cells, therefore, must be equivalent to parasites, or else parasites are contained within or associated with them. 7. Upon any other hypothesis it is difficult to conceive of cells creating a continual stimulus to their own growth energy, and it is still more difficult to explain the rhythms of infectivity. 8. Many lines of evidence point to the presence of some possible organism within the cancer cell; some organism which, acting as does Plasmodiophora brassicae within vegetable cells, underlies the infectivity of cancer cells and provides the stimulus for their continued proliferation. Upon such an assumption the numerous cases of cage infection find their explanation. 9. The various inclusions of the cancer cell which have been described as organisms have been disproved; yet the analogy of club root and the many filter experiments show that the cause of infection may lie within the cancer cell. It is conceivable that, like the yellow fever organism, such an incitant may be in the protoplasm and beyond our powers with the microscope to locate. 10. The spirochaetes which we have found in mouse cancer may have something to do with this infectivity of cancer cells. They may be useful in preparing the "soil" in new mouse hosts and making it susceptible to cell growth; or they may have intracellular stages in their life history which are too minute to be seen. The rhythms of infectivity, finally, may be an expression of the vitality of these spirochaetes or of the hypothetical ultra-microscopical organisms accompanying cancer cells.
The intravenous injection of pilocarpine nitrate causes in the dog a rapid and considerable increase in the output of lymphocytes through the thoracic duct. The corresponding lymphocytosis induced by the drug in the blood of this animal is not profound, and increased cell-output with the lymph will explain a large part if not all of it. Quickened lymph-flow and dyspnoeic breathing are accessory in the production of the large cell-output with the lymph, but it is mainly dependent on some undetermined element. The evidence points to the mechanical nature of this element. It is probably to be sought in direct pressure from contraction of smooth muscle, as suggested by Harvey, but his observation that atropine prevents the appearance of a lymphocytosis after pilocarpine cannot be quoted in proof because atropine much slows the lymph-flow, and thus decreases cell-output. These findings are in accord with the theory that makes mechanical factors responsible for rapidly appearing lymphocytosis. They show that there are more such factors than has been supposed. Especially do they indicate that the contribution of cells through the thoracic duct may be important in the production of lymphocytosis, and is not, as is often asserted, subsidiary to direct migration into the blood of cells from spleen, bone-marrow and the lymph-glands.
OUR RESULTS MAY BE BRIEFLY SUMMARIZED: 1. Blood, when defibrinated, soon loses its power to maintain the activity of the higher nervous centers, and its nutritive properties for all tissues quickly diminish. 2. Artificial fluids, as a substitute for blood, are not satisfactory. 3. The proper oxygenation of the blood is an indispensable adjunct in the resuscitation of an animal. 4. The heart usually continues to beat for some minutes after it ceases to affect a mercury manometer, and resuscitation of it within this period by extra-thoracic massage and artificial respiration is sometimes successful. 5. Resuscitation of the heart by direct massage is the most certain method at our command. 6. A proper blood-pressure is an indispensable condition for the continued normal activity of the heart. 7. Anaesthetics, hemorrhage and induced currents applied to the heart render resuscitation more difficult than asphyxia alone.
ON THE BASIS OF THESE FACTS WE FEEL JUSTIFIED IN MAKING THE FOLLOWING ASSERTION: Under normal conditions and during various procedures (namely, stimulation of the vagus centrally and peripherally, of the saphenus nerve centrally, and of the annulus Vieussentis, intravenous transfusion of 0.7 per cent. sodium chloride solution, intra-arterial transfusion of strong carbonate, bleeding and asphyxia) the pulse pressure is a reliable index of the systolic output.
The experiments on cerebral anaemia have enabled us to duplicate, by an entirely different method, many of the results obtained by anatomical division or removal of parts of the central nervous system. In some respects the method of anaemia permits of greater precision than the method of division or excision, and avoids, in great measure, the disturbances due to the wound and to the hemorrhage caused by the latter method. The method of general anaemia, as Couty pointed out long ago, leaves something to be desired in the matter of exact localization, but this objection may be met, in some degree at least, by appropriate methods of investigation. It is desirable that the results obtained by the method of section should be duplicated by some other method in order to eliminate as much as possible the effects due to the irritation produced by the anatomical lesion. Our results show, as we believe, that, of the bulbar mechanisms studied, the respiratory is the most automatic, the vasomotor in part automatic, and the cardiac like the swallowing mechanism, almost wholly dependent upon afferent impulses for the arousal and discharge of its normal activity. The eye reflexes return during the resuscitation period in the animals in which the cerebral anaemia has not been too prolonged. The motor cortex loses its excitability during anaemia, but may regain it after the reëstablishment of the circulation. The pilomotor mechanism is disturbed during the spasms which occur at a certain stage in the resuscitation. The temperature falls during the occlusion period, but rises again, often to far above normal, in the days following the anaemia. So many disturbing factors, such as the violent muscular contractions during spasms, enter into the problem that it is impossible to say that there is an actual disturbance of the temperature regulating mechanism although we are inclined to believe that this is the case. All the senses return, following cerebral anaemia, but sight and hearing may afterwards fail without causing the death of the animal. The mental processes may return without any apparent deficiency, if the period of anaemia has been short. After longer occlusion, apparent insanity has been seen, and in one case, apparent total loss of mental processes occurred. The reflex excitability of the cord returns rather early in the resuscitation period. Reflexes from the anterior part of the cord first involve muscles on the same side as the stimulus, and later cross to involve muscles of the opposite side. The spinal cord sometimes falls into much the same condition as that following spinal transection, and the scratch reflex appears. Spinal transection, when these reflexes have appeared, does not produce shock. Practically all phenomena of spinal shock may be reproduced without section of the cord. We conclude, therefore, that spinal shock is due more to the cutting off of the reflex pathways through the higher centers of the nervous system than to the stimulation of inhibitory fibers by the anaemia.
1. The nodules found in the spleen are islands of active haematoplastic tissue. 2. The bone-marrow, at least in the case which has been described, has been the primary focus of disease; some toxin has probably produced a chronic inflammatory change. 3. The bone-marrow, owing to its enormous sclerosis, has lost its haemopoëtic powers totally or to a marked degree and the spleen has reverted to its foetal power to form blood.
Our conclusions differ in a few points from those of our first work on this subject. We are able to sum up our observations in this series of experiments as follows: 1. The ophthalmo-tuberculin test is of limited value in the diagnosis of tuberculosis in cattle. In some cases the reaction is very slight (hyperaemia). In others more pronounced congestion with profuse exudates are noted. Accuracy of observation is important. We are inclined to rely primarily on the results of the first instillation of tuberculin. Second instillations in a few instances elicit reaction in non-tubercular animals. 2. In the majority of animals tested the reaction increased in its intensity with each subsequent instillation of tuberculin. This fact indicates the development of a local hypersusceptibility or anaphylaxis associated with a partial immunity; von Pirquet calls this condition "allergie" (9). 3. It is possible in some cases to create a condition of "allergie" in healthy cattle, when spaced instillations of tuberculin are made. It is evident, therefore, that the result of the first instillation of tuberculin should be made the only basis of diagnosis. Rosenau and Anderson (II) have recently called attention to this point in regard to the human subject. 4. When repeated instillations of tuberculin are made on the conjunctiva at short intervals (twenty-four hours, etc.) a local immunity results (No. 3D et al.). If the instillations are separated two weeks or more anaphylaxis results. 5. We, therefore, hold that if tuberculin (0.1 cubic centimeter) is carefully instilled into the conjunctival sac and if careful comparison of the instilled eye with the opposite eye shows that a reaction of varying intensity results in from ten to twelve hours after the first instillation, a tubercular lesion is present. 6. In our first report (7) we were inclined to believe that subcutaneous tubercular injection given previous to the ocular test would slightly inhibit it. We have since become convinced that this is true only to a limited extent, and that in some cases the ophthalmo-reaction is exaggerated by a subcutaneous injection of tuberculin. 7. The primary ophthalmo-tuberculin reaction is in direct proportion to the extent of the tubercular processes in the body. The more extensive the tubercular processes, the more anaphylactic the animal is. This is in direct variance with the condition in the usual subcutaneous tuberculin test. (See Necropsy Report.) 8. We are inclined to believe that the ophthalmo-tuberculin test will reveal tuberculosis at as early a state as the usual subcutaneous test. 9. The ophthalmo-reaction is of no value in determining whether vaccinated cattle are actively tubercular or not, or in demonstrating any hypersusceptibility in the offspring of tubercular cattle. 10. The cutaneous test from our brief series of experiments does not seem to be as accurate as the ophthalmic test. This conclusion has been reached by several investigators.
The leucocytes of the blood of normal individuals and of patients showing a marked polymorphonuclear leucocytosis contain enzymes capable of digesting coagulated blood serum in neutral, alkaline or acid solutions. The cells in pus that is composed principally of polymorphonuclear leucocytes and the leucocytes of the circulating blood in myelogeneous leukaemia contain similar proteolytic enzymes, which act best when the reaction is alkaline. The leucocytes of the circulating blood and of the enlarged lymph nodes from a case of large cell, acute, lymphatic leukaemia contain proteolytic enzymes that act qualitatively in much the same way as the leucocytes of pus and as the white corpuscles of the blood in myelogenous leukaemia. These large lymphocytes in acute lymphatic leukaemia can be differentiated biologically from the small lymphocytes in chronic lymphatic leukaemia which possess no proteolytic enzymes, and from the large endothelioid cells of the hyperplastic lymph glands which are proteolytic only in the presence of acid. These results seem to show that the large cells of the so-called acute lymphatic leukaemia are not true lymphocytes, but are nearly related to the granular myelocytes and should probably be considered as the forerunners to these cells.
1. The removal of one half, two thirds and sometimes three quarters of the kidney substance in the dog causes no change in the general nitrogenous metabolism as determined by estimations of the total nitrogen, urea and ammonia elimination by the urine. 2. The removal of larger amounts, and sometimes of three quarters of the substance, leads to the metabolism condition of starvation. This, however, is apparently the result of the gastro-intestinal disturbance constantly associated with extensive kidney reduction and not of a disturbance of general nitrogenous metabolism. 3. The determination of the amount of faecal nitrogen indicates that the gastro-intestinal disturbance is not due to diminished absorption; and except in one instance there was no evidence of its being due to an increased elimination of nitrogenous substances into the intestine. 4. These experiments do not support the theory that the kidney furnishes an internal secretion having an important influence on general nitrogenous metabolism. At least, if such a function exists, it is not disturbed by the removal of three quarters of the kidney substance. 5. The metabolism in excessive kidney reduction is that of inanition dependent on gastro-intestinal disturbances presumably due to faulty chemical correlation. In this connection further knowledge concerning the elimination into the intestine of toxic substances is desirable.
Epithelioid cells which form the chief element of tuberculous tissue contain an enzyme which causes active digestion of proteid in an approximately neutral or in a weakly acid medium, but is inactive in the presence of weak alkali. This enzyme resembles that which occurs in the large mononuclear cells of an inflammatory exudate and is more active than the similar enzyme of parenchymatons organs such as the liver. The enzyme which digests in the presence of acid exhibits greatest activity at a time when caseation is beginning. With advance of caseation its activity diminishes so that tissue which has undergone almost complete caseation exhibits trivial evidence of the presence of enzyme. It is probable that complete caseation is followed by total disappearance of enzymes. Tuberculous tissue contains an enzyme capable of digesting proteid in the presence of alkali (leucoprotease) only during the early stages of its development. This enzyme, present at a time when the tissue contains numerous polynuclear leucocytes, quickly disappears so that when enzyme digesting in acid is still active, leucoprotease has disappeared. The serum of a tuberculous pleural exudate obtained by intrapleural inoculation with tubercle bacilli causes slight inhibition of the mixture of enzymes contained in tuberculous tissue shortly after inoculation. The serum of blood causes complete inhibition of the enzymes contained in the same tuberculous tissue. Analysis of this difference indicates that the exuded tuberculous serum, like the serum of the blood, inhibits proteolysis caused by leucoprotease, but fails to inhibit digestion caused by an enzyme acting in the presence of acid. In testing this property of the exuded tuberculous serum lymphatic gland has been used because suitable tuberculous tissue has not been available. The serum of the tuberculous pleural exudate produced experimentally not only fails to exert the anti-enzymotic power which is exhibited by the serum of the blood, but is itself capable of causing active digestion of coagulated proteid. Normal blood serum does not digest proteid and the serum of a sterile inflammatory exudate obtained by injection of turpentine into the pleural cavity has caused very little digestion. The tests which have been made indicate that loss of anti-enzymotic power and ability to cause proteolysis increase with the age of the exudate. The foregoing facts offer suggestions which may serve to explain in part the nature of the tubercle and the changes which occur within it. The so-called epithelioid cells of the tubercle resemble the large mononuclear phagocytes of inflammatory exudates and both contain an enzyme of the same character. It is not improbable that caseation which, like autolysis, is accompanied by disappearance of nuclei is in part dependent upon the presence in the cells of this active proteolytic enzyme which is for a time held in check. Injury to cells by products of the tubercle bacillus or partial anaemia, the result of imperfect vascularization of the tuberculous tissue, may have a part in rendering these cells susceptible to self-digestion. Changes which have been observed in serum of the tuberculous exudate show that the anti-enzymotic property of the normal blood may be absent in the exudate of a tuberculous lesion. This loss of anti-enzymotic action, perhaps referable to changes caused by products of the tubercle bacillus, may favor self-digestion of the enzyme-containing cells and diffusion of their enzyme.
By a study of the enzymes contained in fibrinous exudates produced by injection of a sterile inflammatory irritant (turpentine) conditions have been found in which each of two enzymes occurs alone. The one, leucoprotease, digests in the presence of alkali; the other, resembling lymphoprotease, digests in the presence of acid, yet both exhibit almost maximum activity in an approximately neutral medium. It is probable that both enzymes, in the body, exert their greatest activity in an approximately neutral medium, slight changes in reaction increasing digestion by the one, and suspending digestion by the other. The enzyme digesting in acid, present in the fibrinous exudate obtained after a single injection of turpentine, disappears when repeated injection of the same irritant transforms the sero-fibrinous into a purulent exudate, and causes accumulation of leucoprotease in great quantity.
It is our belief that the analyses of histories of cases of epidemic meningitis which have been presented in this article furnish convincing proof that the antimeningitis serum when used by the subdural method of injection, in suitable doses and at proper intervals, is capable of reducing the period of illness; of preventing, in large measure, the chronic lesions and types of the infection; of bringing about complete restoration to health, in all but a very small number of the recovered, thus lessening the serious, deforming, and permanent consequences of meningitis; and of greatly diminishing the fatalities due to the disease.
Vaquez and Aubertin advance three theories in explanation of the adrenal hyperplasia; first, that it may not be the cause of hypertension but "an antitoxic hyperplasia" caused by the retained products of metabolism which may be responsible also for the hypertension; second, that it may be the cause of hypertension but secondary to the renal lesion; third, that it may be the cause of hypertension but may antedate the renal lesion or be entirely independent of it. They, as well as other French writers, insist that this hyperplasia is almost constantly associated with chronic nephritis of the interstitial type and it is seldom found with the parenchymatous type of nephritis, or with other lesions. Hyperplasia of the adrenal, as far as my material enables one to judge, does not occur during the first and second decades. In the third decade it is relatively frequent in the absence of chronic arterial and renal disease but reaches the maximum in association with such disease after the fourth decade. It is an almost constant lesion in arteriosclerosis associated with chronic interstitial nephritis and left-sided heart hypertrophy, but occurs with almost equal frequency in arteriosclerosis with chronic nephritis of the parenchymatous type. It is a relatively frequent lesion of arteriosclerosis without chronic nephritis and of the latter without arteriosclerosis also. As the result of this analysis one is led to the view that while hyperplasia of the adrenal is a very frequent concomitant of chronic renal and arterial disease it is not exclusively a feature of either type of nephritis or yet of chronic vascular disease; but it probably represents the effect of some factor operating in that period of life in which chronic renal and arterial affections are most frequent. Worthy of special emphasis is the observation that the characteristic lesion of an adrenal, the seat of local arteriosclerosis, is of the type of the chronic productive inflammation seen in arteriosclerosis of the pancreas and kidney; that is, thickening of the vessels, increase of connective tissue and round cell infiltration. Associated with these changes is a hyperplasia which is very constant, and which may be, in part, of the nature of a compensatory hyperplasia similar to that seen in the liver of cirrhosis and acute yellow atrophy. A hyperplasia of this type, as has been shown, may occur in destructive lesions of the gland. This, however, does not explain hyperplasia in the absence of local vascular changes which fact is, possibly, as suggested by Landau, evidence, not of a correlation between kidney and adrenal, but of a vicarious hypertrophy depending upon lesions of some other organ of the body than the kidney, possibly some other ductless gland, affected by arteriosclerosis or other disease.
The immediate effect of the operation on the portion of the kidney remaining is an infarcation of the tissue compressed by the sutures. This area of necrosis extends but a short distance into the adjacent kidney tissue. The infarcated tissue gradually becomes replaced by fibrous tissue and in three to four week's time the necrotic tissue entirely disappears. The amount of fibrous tissue in time becomes so slight and the healing so perfect that it is difficult to detect the site of the operation. The renal elements sometimes persist in the infarcated area and the glomeruli apparently are more resistant than the tubules. The tubules in the infarcated area sometimes become calcified and bone formation beneath the epithelium of the pelvis is of very frequent occurrence. The pelvic epithelium usually shows marked proliferation and may invade the field of operation in alveolar masses. Calculi may form in the pelvis of the kidney. Sutures penetrating the pelvis as well as the necrotic tissue resulting from the compression of the sutures probably furnish the nuclei for the calculi. Removal of approximately half of one kidney did not alter either the remaining portion of that kidney or the size of the opposite kidney in two animals of this series. These experiments were terminated on the thirty-fourth and forty-seventh days. In a similar experiment of twenty-one day's duration there was slight but definite atrophy of the remaining tissue of the kidney operated upon. Removal of approximately half of each kidney at one operation did not alter the remaining kidney tissue in two animals of the second group. The longest period of observtaion was fifty-four days. On the other hand in a similar experiment where 164 days elapsed, the remaining portions of each kidney had increased markedly in size. Removal of one kidney and approximately half of the other did not alter the remaining kidney tissue in six animals in which from five to fifty-six days elapsed before termination of the experiment. In six experiments in which one kidney was removed and approximately half of the other, three of the animals died as a result of the operation on the sixth, seventh and tenth days. The probable cause of death was renal insufficiency: the animals refused food, vomited persistently and lost strength and weight. The other three animals recovered and were killed at periods varying from five to eight weeks. The reduction of the kidney tissue to one quarter of its original amount at one operation was attained with danger but was not necessarily fatal. In every experiment there was a loss of weight varying from four to twenty-four per cent. To what extent this loss in weight is due to the reduction of kidney substance and to what extent it is due to diet and confinement it is impossible to say, as we made no control experiments to elucidate these points.
1. In work along this line it is most important to have a simple method of determining the catalytic activity of tissues. The method must be such that several observations can be made during a single experiment, so that a better idea can be obtained of the velocity of the reaction at various intervals. 2. The catalytic activity of human tissues varies greatly in diseases. A. Nephritis.-The kidney always shows the most marked reduction although the other tissues examined, blood, lung, liver, spleen, likewise show decrease in their power of decomposing hydrogen peroxide. This reduction varies directly with the severity of the pathological lesion in the kidney and the clinical symptoms. The urine also in cases of nephritis shows a much greater inhibiting power than normal urine. This may be accounted for by the reaction of the urine, and subsequent work must prove whether or not the kidney takes any more active part in nephritis and secretes into the blood and urine a substance which manifests itself by a reduction in the catalytic activity. B. The catalytic activity of the blood in the two cases of eclampsia which we have studied was not reduced. This is the most important fact we have so far obtained, if it can be substantiated, since it can furnish us with a ready ante-mortem means of differentiating eclampsia and nephritis. C.Pneumonia.-The lung in the stage of red hepatization has an increased catalytic activity. This increase varies directly with the number of intact red blood cells in the exudate, and in the engorged capillaries. Strength is given to this conclusion by the fact, that on the one hand, there is no increased activity in gray hepatization, while on the other hand, there is an enormously increased activity in the fresh hemorrhagic infarct. D. Tuberculosis.-The decreased activity of the lung in tuberculosis is probably due, for the most part, to the lack of blood in the diseased area, while the lowered activity which is present in the other organs is to be explained by the anaemia and emaciation which accompanies the process. Whether there is a specific catalytic inhibiting substance generated by the process, has not been determined. E. There was no reduction of the catalytic activity in the cases of diabetes mellitus and jaundice studied. F. In the one case of asphyxiation by illuminating gas, there was decided decrease in the catalytic activity of the blood. G. The tissues in the one case of congenital syphilis showed a marked lowering of the catalytic activity. 3. There is a slight decrease in the catalytic activity of the tissues due to post-mortem change, but this is so slight that it is hardly to be taken into consideration in the interpretation of the results obtained. 4. There is no marked change in the catalytic activity due to age. In concluding, we wish to thank Dr. A. S. Loevenhart, at whose suggestion this enzyme was studied, for the unfailing interest with which he has followed the progress of this work, and for the many valuable suggestions he has given us.
To determine the limits of recovery after a total anemia of the central nervous system, a series of thirty dogs was killed by chloroform and resuscitated after varying times from three to fourteen minutes. Under five minutes the recovery of function was rapid and strikingly free from the after effects which characterized longer periods. Of seven animals between the periods of five and six and one-half minutes, only one died apparently as a direct result of the anemia, but of twelve between the periods of seven minutes and eight and one-half minutes, only one, after seven and one-half minutes recovered. The remaining dogs all died. Further corroborative data are drawn from the previously published paper on the technique of resuscitation. Histological examination both of presumptive recoveries and fatal cases was made by ordinary methods and those of Nissl and Marchi. The neurocytes of the fatal cases uniformly presented the greatest change, not merely chromolytic but here and there definitely indicative of cell death. Marchi's method further supported these findings by proving the existence of fiber degeneration. Finally, showing the narrowness of the escape, the animal with best result in recovery, seven and one-half minutes in time, which at the end of four weeks had apparently entirely returned to a normal state, by the Marchi method had a degeneration of a number of fibers localized in the pyramidal fasciculi which were traced from the cord to the cortex, and in Flechsig's fasciculus, as well as a more sparsely scattered degeneration of both ascending and descending fibers elsewhere.
The four cultures which form the basis of this communication were recovered from peculiar cases of primary cervical adenitis in man, three of which terminated fatally of disseminated acute miliary tuberculosis in four to six weeks. A careful comparative study shows that Culture II corresponds closely with the "human" and Culture IV with the "bovine" type of tubercle bacilli; while Cultures I and III present variations from the standard types and are to be retarded as "intermediate" or "atypical" forms. Culture I is of unusual interest because of its remarkable variations. The clinical picture of the case, the rapid course of the infection, the enormous number of the bacilli in the tissue, their tendency to occur in "heaps" like the leprosy bacillus, the high degree of virulence alike for rabbits and guinea-pigs, the production of lesions in chickens, the case of cultivation and the prolonged viability under unfavorable conditions, all mark the organism as a decided atypical form of tubercle bacillus in man. The prolonged viability, the production of lesions in the chicken and the great profusion of bacillary growth in the tissues would indicate an avian type. Though for years the reaction curve was atypical it has since changed completely to the "avian" curve. In this connection it is of interest to note that L. Rabinowitsch (3) states that she has isolated avian tubercle bacilli from two cases of tuberculosis in man. Cultures II and III undoubtedly belong to the human type of the tubercle family though they were under cultivation and were repeatedly tested upon glycerine broth over a period of months before their identity was definitely established. Culture IV completely corresponds in growth and reaction in glycerine bouillon to the bovine strain; however, it manifests a low degree of virulence for rabbits which is exceptional for bovine cultures. The old belief that bovine bacilli are more slender and beaded in the tissues and are thicker and shorter in culture than the human type, I have not been able to confirm. The morphological characters of the different cultures here reported were so inconstant that no reliance could be placed on this feature as an aid in differentiation. Outside of the animal body it would seem that the differences in size and character of the individual bacilli depend largely on the kind and reaction of the medium, whilst in the animal body they are influenced by their situation and the resistance of the host. The nature of the growth of these tubercle cultures varies for the same culture even under apparently identical conditions. The character of the growth was never an indication of the type of the culture, It was common to obtain two distinct types of growth on the same flask of bouillon, i. e., a portion of the surface would be covered with a heavy and uniformly granular layer of closely packed wax-like colonies twice the size of an ordinary pin's head, while the other portion would be a dense homogeneous layer with the typical depressed blisters. The rapidity of growth also varied greatly for the same culture. Often in a series of twelve or more bouillon flasks which were prepared alike and inoculated with the same culture, some would cover the surface in eight days to two weeks, others would take four to six weeks, still others two to three months. It was thought in the beginning of the work that this variation might depend on the amount of oxygen within the flask or on the change in reaction in the bouillon, but further tests proved that neither of these influenced the rate of growth in any way. It would occur in loosely corked flasks as well as in those that were sealed, and in flasks where the reaction was neutral, acid or slightly alkaline. It would seem that these changes are by no means specific for any group of the tubercle bacilli but a property possessed by them all. The growth of the cultures on solid medium showed approximately the same variation as that from the surface of the glycerine bouillon. The wax-like colonies described by L. Rabinowitsch (3) as characteristic for avian tubercle bacilli were noted at times for all of the cultures. On the modified egg mixture the growth was always more rapid and profuse than on any other medium. I found this egg medium more certain than any other for the direct recovery of the tubercle bacillus from the tissues. Where it was desired to recover the culture from the animal tissues with certainty and celerity it had no equal. Occasionally in seven days after the inoculation of the tuberculous gland material the growth was sufficiently advanced to transplant to the bouillon flasks. The glycerine bouillon test serves admirably to distinguish between the human, bovine and avian types of tubercle bacilli. It is also of value in the determination of degrees of adaptation in man for bacilli of the lower host-species, and in the recognition of "intermediate" types. The test to be of differential value requires repeated application and careful control over a period of months. Some freshly isolated cultures may produce their specific reaction curve in glycerine bouillon within a few weeks. On the other hand the same culture may fail to give its characteristic reaction or any alteration in the glycerine bouillon for several months though the growth has been luxuriant and complete. The rise in acidity that occurs in glycerine bouillon for the human type of tubercle bacilli is due to a specific action on the glycerine of the products of disintegration of bacilli (autolysis); with the bovine and avian types the products of bacillary disintegration have no action on the glycerine. The fall in acidity which occurs for all three types of the tubercle bacillus is due to the products of metabolic activity.
1. Extracts of the rabbit's kidney injected into the rabbit cause a slight, increase in blood pressure which is barely more than that due to the mechanical effect of the injection. 2. Extracts of the dog's kidney injected into the dog cause a decided fall in pressure; an equal fall may be caused by the dog's urine. A series of control experiments indicates that the fall caused by the kidney extract may be due to the urinary salts which it contains. 3. Extracts of cat's kidney cause a rise in pressure. As the cat's urine causes a fall, this rise in pressure indicates the possibility of a kidney extract containing a pressor substance which cannot be influenced by the depressor substance of the urine. 4. Rabbit's kidney, which in the rabbit produces a slight rise, when injected into the dog causes a drop comparable to that caused by the dog's kidney itself. Similarly, the dog's kidney, which injected into the dog causes a drop, produces in the rabbit a rise analogous to that produced by rabbit's kidney. It is evident therefore that these pressor and depressor substances of the kidneys in question do not have a constant effect on all animals as do the extracts of the adrenal gland. 5. Extracts of kidneys which are the seat of various forms of nephritis cause the same effect as extracts of normal kidneys. 6. The serum of dogs with considerable reduction of kidney substance causes a slight fall in pressure; the serum of dogs with spontaneous nephritis gives divergent results, as does also the serum of rabbits with various forms of acute nephritis. The serum of dogs with chromate nephritis causes a slight rise, while that of dogs with uranium nephritis produces a sharp and decided fall in pressure. Although there is no uniformity in these results, their general character, and especially the experience with uranium and chromate sera of the dog, suggests that pressure-disturbing substances are present in the serum as the result of the kidney lesion. The very slight evidence of the constant presence of a pressor substance, however, offers little support to the theory that such a substance is furnished by the diseased kidney or is due to disturbances of metabolism caused by disease of the kidney.
THE LAST MENTIONED FACT MAY PERHAPS FIND ITS EXPLANATION IN THE FOLLOWING STATEMENTS: the two pleural cavities are separated by the layers of the anterior and posterior mediastinal septa. Between the two lies the heart. In the dog, the posterior seems to be somewhat tougher than the anterior septum, and somewhat more fixed and tense. With violent respiratory movements, it is the anterior septum which more especially flaps to and fro and bulges when an opening in the pleura has been made, and it is the anterior septum which is so apt to rupture and thus cause double pneumothorax and the death of the animal. When the dog is on its back, the heart falls backward and the bulging of the anterior mediastinal septum is made more easy. It is different when the animal is on its belly. The heart falls toward the anterior chest wall and thus supports the anterior septum: hence the flapping of the septum, the interference with the respiration of the lung on the sound side, the bulging on expiration on the open side, can not so readily occur. The danger of the open pneumothorax is greatly lessened when the animal is in the prone position. In the supine position the danger of the pneumothorax is due to the falling back of the heart and thus facilitating the rupture of the fragile anterior mediastinal septum; the danger is therefore obviated by fixing the pericardium to the anterior wall of the thorax.
1. In non-nephrectomized animals the addition of adrenalin to sodium chloride solutions or to mixtures of sodium chloride and calcium chloride solutions increases the amount of urine and of ascites, and diminishes the intestinal fluid (this diminution takes place only with mixtures of solutions of sodium chloride and calcium chloride, the quantity of intestinal fluid remaining approximately unchanged in the sodium chloride series). 2. In nephrectomized animals the addition of adrenalin to sodium chloride solutions or to mixtures of sodium chloride and calcium chloride solutions again increases the ascites and diminishes the amount of intestinal fluid in both sodium chloride and sodium chloride plus calcium chloride series. 3. We find, therefore, a summation of the action of calcium chloride and adrenalin in regard to their influence upon the formation of ascites, an antagonistic action in regard to the elimination of urine; here the influence of calcium chloride in diminishing the urine is more potent than is the action of adrenalin in increasing the amount of urine. The adrenalin decreases the elimination of fluid into the intestines and in this case we note a summation of the actions of calcium chloride and of adrenalin. 4. We see, therefore, that adrenalin and calcium chloride influence the amount of ascitic fluid and of intestinal fluid in the same direction. The amount of urine is, however, decreased by calcium chloride and increased by adrenalin. 5. If we increase the rapidity of inflow of the solutions and simultaneously decrease proportionately the time of the infusion, the amount of ascites and intestinal fluids in nephrectomized animals remains approximately unchanged, as compared with the amounts obtained at the usual rate of inflow.
1. Animals in which experimental myocarditis has been produced and winch are infused with sodium chloride solutions show a marked decrease in the amount of the secretion of urine. This decrease is even more pronounced than that produced when calcium chloride is added to sodium chloride solution. The intestinal fluid which is markedly decreased, and the peritoneal transudate which is increased by calcium chloride are, on the other hand, not markedly influenced by myocarditic lesions. We may, therefore, conclude that calcium chloride does not exert its specific effect on the quantity of peritoneal fluid through a lowering of blood pressure. 2. Each of the three factors, namely, calcium chloride, adrenalin and myocarditic lesions affects the elimination of fluid through the kidneys, through the mucosa of the small intestine and through the endothelial lining of the peritoneal cavity in a specific way. The conditions influencing the elimination of fluids through these three surfaces seem, therefore, to be different in each case and characteristic for the cells lining these surfaces.
1. The results of this work form a confirmation of the earlier work of Cushing in all details investigated. 2. The increase of blood pressure that results from an increase of the intracranial pressure above the blood pressure is due in the dog to a vaso-constriction of the vessels of the intestine, the kidney and the limbs. Preceding this constriction there is dilatation. 3. The anastomotic connection between the internal carotid artery within the skull and the ophthalmic branch of the internal maxillary is of a size in the dog approximately equal to the internal carotid outside of the skull. The anatomical relations are such as to indicate that the internal maxillary artery in this animal is a cerebral artery equal in importance to the internal carotid. The anastomotic connection because of its position within the cranial cavity is unaffected except by extreme grades of intracranial compression. 4. The ordinary method of artificial perfusion of the dog's brain as used in physiological investigation appears from this work to be of no value, since there is at least one important path open besides that through the vessels of the brain. 5. The increase of the intracranial pressure above the blood pressure leads to a complete anaemia, superficial and deep, of the blood vessels of the brain. If the intracranial pressure is not greatly increased above the blood pressure, the circle of Willis and some of the larger arterial connections at the base of the brain are more or less well injected. An intracranial pressure somewhat below blood pressure leads apparently to a certain degree of anaemia directly beneath the point of entrance of the intracranial fluid; the condition of the rest of the brain as regards blood supply is normal.
Histoplasmosis is a fatal infectious disease of tropical America resembling kala-azar of India. It is characterized clinically by splenomegaly, emaciation, irregular pyrexia, leucopenia and anemia. The pathological features are the invasion of endothelial cells in the smaller lymph and blood vessels and capillaries by enormous numbers of a small encapsulated microorganism (Histoplasma capsulatum) causing necroses of the liver with cirrhosis, splenomegaly, psudo-granulomata of the lungs, small and large intestines, with ulceration of the latter, and necrosis of lymph nodes draining the injected viscera. The disease is caused by a small round or oval microörganism 1 to 4 micro in diameter possessing a polymorphous, chromatin nucleus, basophilic cytoplasm and achromatic spaces all enclosed within an achromatic refractile capsule. The microorganism differs from the Leishman-Donovan body of kala-azar in the form and arrangement of its chromatin nucleus, and in not possessing a chromatin rod.
The venom of Crotalus adamanteus when administered intravenously to rabbits in properly graded doses causes lesions of the glomerulus of tile kidney which may be either hemorrhagic or exudative in character. Both types of lesion are usually associated but either one or the other may predominate. The hemorrhagic lesion, which may be confined to the glomerular tuft, or, by rupture of the latter, may involve the capsular space, is a peculiar localization of the hemorrhage so common in other parts of the body in venom intoxication. On the other hand, the exquisite exudative lesion involving usually the capsular space but sometimes limited, as in the hemorrhagic type, to the tuft itself and with little or no tubular injury, constitutes a type of experimental vascular nephritis, hitherto undescribed, which differs widely in its anatomical appearance from that due to arsenic, cantharidin and other vascular poisons. As the limitation of the lesion to the glomerulus indicates a selective action of the venom, and as the histological changes in the tuft are suggestive of gradual endothelial destruction and solution, the lesion can be explained by the action of the endotheliolytic body of crotalus venom described by Flexner and Noguchi.
In reviewing the literature, no description of a lipemia occurring in relation to simple hemorrhage was found, so that the observation of the phenomenon here recorded would seem to be new. Very high percentages of fat have been found in the blood of diabetics. Fischer's case showed 18.1 per cent total ether extract. Of this very little was free fat (0.0018 gm. potassium hydroxide per gram of fat); iodine absorption was 60.6 per cent.; cholesterin, 2.6 per cent. Chatin's case, cited by Fischer, showed 1.2 per cent. cholesterin, 66.5 per cent. olein, 32.2 per cent. margarin in the fat. Neisser and Derlin in the ether extract of blood from a patient with diabetic coma found 19.7 per cent. fat, with melting point of from 39 degrees to 41 degrees C.; iodine absorption was 53.6 per cent. Javal in a similar case found 25.4 per cent. of fat in ether extract of dry serum (perhaps by Soxhlet method); 21 per cent. of the fat was lecithin. Bleibtreu produced alimentary lipemia in geese by feeding barley and butter. Ether extract of serum showed 6 per cent. of fat. The serum was milky with invisible droplets. Iodine absorption was 57 to 58 per cent. The fat was quite different, chemically, from the fat in the food. Lipemia disappeared a few days after discontinuing the forced feeding. Our experiments suggest, by analogy, the possible occurrence of lipemia in human anemias. In this connection it is of interest to note that we have recently demonstrated a moderate lipemia in a case of marked secondary anemia from hemorrhoids. The emaciation in such cases, as contrasted with the well-recognized conservation of the fat in pernicious anemia, suggests in human pathology a still further analogy which we now have under investigation. The fat in our lipemic rabbits differs from fats described above in its insolubility, as well as in its "constants." The change after precipitation of calcium from the serum suggests that the fat may be present in the serum as a protein-calcium-lecithin combination which is decomposed by decalcifying. While we are not prepared to offer an explanation of the mechanism of this lipemia, it is possible that the great loss of tissue proteins may have some influence on the abnormal fat metabolism. That the fat is derived from the tissues is a fair inference when its occurrence in connection with the loss of weight and the previous disappearance of the body fat are taken into consideration. A more careful study of the lipase in the blood and tissues is desirable. It may be that lowered oxidation following great loss of red cells plays a part.
The study carried out and recorded in this paper did not lead to the finding of any reliable criteria of difference between strains of Diplococcus intracellularis obtained from typical cases of epidemic meningitis and several cultures obtained from cases of posterior basic meningitis. The successful experiments made with monkeys show that the diplococcus obtained from cases of posterior basic meningitis is capable of setting up rapidly and acutely fatal forms of meningitis and in producing organic lesions of the cerebral tissues of great severity. This study would, therefore, suggest that the antimeningitis serum should be as useful in cases of posterior basic meningitis so-called, as it has been in epidemic meningitis, especially if it were employed early in the disease.
Decreasing the temperature from 37 degrees C. to 5 degrees C. perceptibly and regularly increases hemolysis in hypotonic sodium chloride and cane sugar solutions, when the erythrocytes of a number of the common mammals are considered. The measurements were carried out with Smith's modification of the method of Hamburger. If following the original method of Hamburger one relies on the point of beginning hemolysis as an index of corpuscle resistance, the facts are not brought out clearly. The effect is in the opposite direction from that which would prevail if the laws governing change of osmotic pressure with change of temperature were the influential factors. The results possibly depend on some change in the permeability or consistence of the erythrocytic protoplasm considered as a semi-permeable membrane.
1. In the secondary and tertiary stages of syphilis without direct involvement of the nervous system the cerebro-spinal fluid yielded the butyric acid reaction of feeble intensity. The fluid under these conditions gave neither a positive cytodiagnosis nor the Wassermann test for syphilis. 2. The cerebro-spinal fluid of cases of hereditary syphilis showed a positive butyric reaction in about 90 per cent. and a positive Wassermann test in about 80 per cent. of the cases examined. 3. The cerebro-spinal fluid of cases of cerebral and spinal syphilis yielded the butyric acid reaction and the cytodiagnosis in every instance (100 per cent.) and gave the Wassermann reaction in from 50 to 75 per cent. of those examined. 4. The cerebro-spinal fluid from cases of general paralysis gave positive butyric acid reactions in 90 per cent., positive cell counts in 91 per cent., and positive Wassermann test in 73 per cent. of those examined. 5. The cerebro-spinal fluid from cases of tabes dorsalis gave positive butyric acid reactions and cell counts in 100 per cent. and positive Wassermann test in 53 per cent. of those examined. 6. The cerebro-spinal fluid from other forms of psychosis in which a syphilitic history was not obtained gave positive butyric acid reactions and cell count in 2.8 per cent. and Wassermann test in 13 per cent. of those examined. 7. The cerebro-spinal fluid from cases of acute inflammatory diseases of the meninges always gave a flocculent precipitate with the butyric acid reaction but never gave the Wassermann test. 8. The cerebro-spinal fluid from persons suffering from typhoid fever, pneumonia, pulmonary tuberculosis, etc., in which the meninges are not inflamed, gave neither the butyric acid nor the Wassermann test. 9. We think it justifiable to conclude that the butyric acid reaction affords a ready means of distinguishing normal from pathological cerebro-spinal fluid and will prove to be useful in routine clinical practice, especially in detecting syphilitic disease and in confirming or setting aside certain doubtful diagnoses of syphilitic or metasyphilitic lesions of the central nervous system. The reaction should commend itself as a valuable addition to the Wassermann test, the results of which it is capable of confirming and extending.
The high variability in infectivity of Diplococcus intracellularis makes it impracticable to standardize the antimeningitis serum on the basis of the virulence of the diplococcus. The irregularity of reaction of small animals to the poison or endotoxin of Diplococcus intracellularis makes it impracticable to standardize the antimeningitis serum on the basis of endotoxic value. The want of uniformity in the complement-binding power of the antimeningitis serum, and the absence of established relation between complement-binding power and therapeutic activity make the employment of this method of standardization impracticable. The part taken by specific opsonins in promoting recovery from infection with Diplococcus intracellularis suggests their employment as a measure of the therapeutic activity of the antiserum. Methods of quantitative estimation of opsonic content of the antimeningitis serum being available, it would seem advantageous to adopt for the present as a standard of value a definite and suitable strength in opsonins of the antimeningitis serum. As a definite and suitable standard of strength a minimum dilution activity of a 1 to 5,000 dilution of the antiserum is proposed. Since the immune opsonins of the antimeningitis serum appear to be highly durable under proper conditions of refrigeration of the antiserum, the test proposed will be applicable when the antimeningitis serum shall have become an article of commerce.
1. As a result of the intravenous infusion of a solution of sodium chloride a characteristic curve indicating the fluid retained in the vascular system is obtained. In the first period of the infusion the maximum of retention of fluid is noted. Then more fluid is removed from the blood vessels, so that for a short time a fall in the curve of dilution takes place, after which the dilution again slowly increases. 2. This curve is not materially changed by the addition of calcium chloride or of adrenalin to the infused solution, and under such conditions adrenalin does not lead to an increased pressing out of fluid from the vascular system, although is causes a constant and decided rise in blood pressure. Myocarditic lesions lead to an increased intravascular retention of fluid. Nephrectomy does not lead to an increased intravascular retention of fluid, but probably causes a diminution of the amount of fluid retained in the blood vessels.
1. Direct measurements of the blood pressure carried out during the intravenous infusion of various solutions into rabbits show that although a relation between the height of blood pressure and secretion of urine may be noted, a direct relation docs not exist between blood pressure and peritoneal transudate and intestinal fluid. 2. Calcium chloride docs not increase the peritoneal transudate by a rise of blood pressure, nor does it decrease the intestinal fluid by a fall of blood pressure, since no such increase of peritoneal fluid nor decrease of intestinal fluid is noticeable in animals with myocarditic lesions which are infused with solutions of sodium chloride. 3. It can be proved that calcium chloride does not diminish the amount of urine as a result of its depressing action on the blood pressure. Our experiments make it probable that calcium chloride decreases the diuresis by a direct action on the renal epithelium.
1. After thyroidectomy the glycosuria, produced by ether or adrenalin in the normal animal, is greatly reduced. 2. Thyroidless dogs fed on powdered thyroid glands show a return of glycosuria more or less proportional to the amount ingested when treated with adrenalin or ether. 3. As the thyroids regenerate the ether or adrenalin glycosuria increases similarly. The results of these experiments leave no doubt in our minds that the secretion of the thyroid glands is connected in some obscure way with the metabolism of sugar in the body or exerts some control over organs whose duty it is to participate in the sugar metabolism.
1. The thyroid exerts a retarding action on the carbohydrate destroying mechanism of the body. 2. This retarding action is not changed when the gland is boiled, showing that it is not a ferment action. 3. Iodothyrin, the active principle of the gland, exerts this retarding influence more markedly even than the whole thyroid. 4. This antagonism between the thyroid and the carbohydrate destroying mechanism is a direct one, as other ductless glands and the nervous system are eliminated from the experiments. 5. These results confirm those of Falta along similar lines.
1. We have confirmed previous work which shows that the injection of bile increases the tone of the vagus nerve, and that this action can be abolished after the administration of atropine. 2. We have found that the amount of bile salts in a lethal dose of pig's bile for dog's will, if inejcted alone, produce neither a fall in blood pressure nor a slowing in rate. 3. We have found that the amount of pigment in a lethal dose of the bile will, if injected alone, cause death with slowing of the heart and lowering of blood pressure. 4. We have found that the bile pigment in combination with calcium or sodium is less toxic than uncombined pigment. 5. We have found that in experimentally produced jaundice the calcium content of the blood is increased, while that of the liver, muscle and brain are decreased. 6. We are of the opinion that increase in calcium in the blood is a protective mechanism against the circulating pigments of obstructive jaundice.
The experiments which have been presented show that the spinal fluid occupies a unique position among the fluids which accumulate in serous cavities of the body. It contains normally neither proteolytic enzyme nor anti-enzyme, whereas blood serum, from which it is derived, exhibits both enzymotic and anti-enzymotic activity. In the blood anti-enzyme greatly predominates over enzyme, so that proteolysis does not occur, unless the anti-enzymotic power of the serum has been destroyed by the addition of acid. In pathological conditions both enzyme and anti-enzyme may make their appearance in the spinal fluid. With inflammations of other serous cavities of the body the anti-enzyme of the exuded serum as a rule preponderates over and restrains the activity of the proteolytic enzyme freed from leucocytes. On the other hand, in infection of the meninges with Diplococcus lanceolatus and with Streptococcus mucosus free proteolytic enzyme has been present in considerable amount in four of five fluids which have been tested. Free proteolytic enzyme has not been observed in the spinal fluid in cases of epidemic meningitis. The cases which have been studied demonstrate that in epidemic meningitis some anti-enzymotic action may be present in the early stages of the disease; but it tends to disappear rapidly so that anti-enzyme seems to be constantly at a low ebb. It is possible that the absence of anti-enzyme in normal spinal fluid, and the tendency for it to disappear so much more rapidly than in other inflammatory exudates, may explain in part the severity of acute meningeal infections. Non-inflammatory transudates into the subdural spaces differ from inflammatory exudates in that the inhibitory element of the blood serum accumulates, and this accumulation suggests an interference with the elimination of the antibody from the spinal fluid. Such interference is not evident in so-called serous meningitis. In content of anti-enzyme the spinal fluid of chronic conditions, such as tuberculous meningitis, apparently occupies an intermediate position between acute inflammation and serous effusion, and five of seven tuberculous fluids which were tested exhibited various degrees of anti-enzymotic action. Variations in content of enzyme and anti-enzyme, noted above, may depend upon the rapidity with which the fluid, carrying the elements mentioned, enters the spinal cavity, as well as upon the rate of their elimination from the spinal fluid. Subdural injection of large quantities of anti-meningitis serum (horse's blood serum) does not increase the anti-enzymotic activity of fluids withdrawn twenty-four hours after its injection; disappearance of anti-enzyme being caused by rapid elimination of serum from the spinal fluid.
1. Phagocytosis of pneumococci in vitro runs parallel with phagocytosis in vivo. 2. Virulence depends not only on resistance to phagocytosis, but also on the ability to grow in the body of the animal. 3. The biological reaction of the pigeon to pneumococcus infection does not differ from that of the mouse. 4. The "immunity" of the pigeon to pneumococcus infection is due to its normal high temperature.
1. Phagocytosis of pneumococci in vitro runs parallel with phagocytosis in vivo. 2. Virulence depends not only on resistance to phagocytosis, but also on the ability to grow in the body of the animal. 3. The biological reaction of the pigeon to pneumococcus infection does not differ from that of the mouse. 4. The "immunity" of the pigeon to pneumococcus infection is due to its normal high temperature.
THESE EXPERIMENTS SUGGEST THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS CONCERNING HEMOLYTIC ACTION: 1. It is probably the proteid part of the serum which inhibits the bile salts. 2. The cholalic acid group is the active part of the bile salt molecule. 3. The protection afforded by bile salts against serum is of especial interest from the following considerations: (a) The protective action is a property apparently peculiar to proteids obtained from blood serum. It is not given satisfactorily by egg albumen. (b) The conjugation of cholalic acid with glycocoll in the formation of the bile salts is of some advantage to the organism. Although the toxicity of the cholalate for red corpuscles, when free from serum, is at most only slightly diminished by conjugation, yet the blood serum possesses a greater inhibiting action for the resulting glycocholate than for the original cholalate. 4. As compared with its inhibition of sodium glycocholate, normal serum possesses relatively little inhibiting action against certain foreign hemolytic agents, such as tetanus toxin, sodium benzoate, phenol and ethyl alcohol. 5. Hemolytic experiments afford a fairly general method for studying, in vitro, certain syntheses occurring in the body. They avoid, largely, the complications, such as rapid chemical alteration, which might occur in animal experimentation. Contrary to the results obtained with bile salts, the conjugation of benzoic acid and of phenol results in an effective reduction of their hemolytic action independently of the presence or absence of serum.
1. Removal of the thyroid glands causes a rise in the assimilation limit for dextrose. 2. If the parathyroids are left, this result is permanent. 3. The thyroids probably inhibit normally the direct combustion of the sugar in the muscles.
1. In infections with streptococcus in man, such as acute septic endocarditis, and tonsillitis, there is produced a powerful opsonic immunity. 2. This opsonic immunity is effective towards the streptococcus which has caused infection but may be ineffective in the presence of streptococcus from other sources. 3. Little benefit can be expected from streptococcus vaccines unless they are prepared from the streptococcus which has caused infection.
1. For the study of the character of nitrogen metabolism in nephritis the nitrogen intake of the patient needs to he regulated in such a manner that it should not exceed the nitrogen value which the diseased kidneys are capable of eliminating. 2. The eliminating capacity of the kidneys can he established in the following manner: the patient is placed on a diet containing a low proportion of protein (equivalent to about 5 grams of nitrogen) and a sufficient supply of calories. To this diet from day to day varying quantities of urea are added and the nitrogen output for every twenty-four hours is estimated. The highest nitrogen output under this condition is regarded as the maximum of the eliminating capacity of the kidneys for nitrogenous substances. 3. In the observations recorded in this communication the nitrogen output of the patient on the standard diet remained at 5.5 grams per day. The addition to the diet of 1.5 to 3 grams of nitrogen in form of urea caused a rise in the intake not exceeding 6.25 grams. On the basis of this, the diet was regulated so as not to exceed a nitrogen intake of 7 grams. 4. Comparing the rate of elimination of nitrogen after the administration of glycin, alanin, and asparagin with that after the administration of urea, there was noted a slower rate after the administration of the first two acids, and an equal rate after the administration of asparagin (probably owing to the presence of an acid amid group in the molecule). 5. After the administration of excessive protein in addition to the standard diet, there was noted a much lower rate of nitrogen elimination than was to be expected in a normal man, on the basis of the work of Falta. 6. Of the total nitrogen removed in excess over that on the standard diet in our patient, 80 per cent. was in the form of urea, while in normal man, as calculated from the tables of Folin, one finds the proportion of urea to vary between 90 and 100 per cent., while in a normal dog the proportion is always 100 per cent. 7. On the basis of these observations it was concluded that in our patient the rate of conversion of protein into simple nitrogenous substances and into urea is below the normal. 8. The patient remained for four months in a condition of nitrogenous equilibrium, and otherwise in good health, on a diet containing about 6.5 grams of nitrogen and 3,000 calories, which were reduced to 2,500 calories to prevent constant gain in weight. 9. From this it seems suggestive that also for dietetic-therapeutic purposes it may be of importance to establish the eliminating efficiency of the kidneys for nitrogenous substances.
This new division of the Journal is specially designed to be of use to active Health Officers of the countries represented in the American Public Health Association. It will be unable to serve its true function unless the Health Officers are willing to coöperate by sending to the Journal copies of their reports, bulletins, new ordinances and personal information which will be of general interest. Furthermore it would be distinctly desirable if communications on subjects of general interest are submitted for publication in this division of the Journal. The management will further welcome any suggestions from Health Officers for the improvement of this division. All communications should be addressed to Selskar M. Gunn, Managing Editor, American Journal of Public Health, 755 Boylston St., Boston, Mass.
This new division of the Journal is specially designed to be of use to active Health Officers of the countries represented in the American Public Health Association. It will be unable to serve its true function unless the Health Officers are willing to coöperate by sending to the Journal copies of their reports, bulletins, new ordinances and personal information which will be of general interest. Furthermore it would be distinctly desirable if communications on subjects of general interest are submitted for publication in this division of the Journal. The management will further welcome any suggestions from Health Officers for the improvement of this division. All communications should be addressed to Selskar M. Gunn, Managing Editor, American Journal of Public Health, 755 Boylston St., Boston, Mass.
